Farthest South...um, I was gonna say Egypt or Morocco, but it looks like it's Mexico. Specifically Palenque, Merida, Cancun. I went there in middle school for field trips for my Spanish classes. Bringing forty 13 year olds to Mexico? Big mistake! WE drove Senora Simon crazy. "Ay Julia!"
½ cup maple syrup
This is just a starter list to begin to keep you safe in the cyber world. Also a general rule I follow too is someone close always has been given the person I am meeting’s cell number. If you’re already thinking the person sounds creepy on the phone, don’t agree to meet with them, and if they don’t look anything like their photos and you aren’t interested be prepared with some excuse to get out of there early. I am all about being polite but deception or over exaggeration on the other person’s part isn’t very polite either.
If you agree, please tell 10 people you know and tell them to tell 10
The first way He brings order is by “taming” the darkness. He makes light, and declares the light to be good. Next, He tames the sea and the sky, by grouping together waters. On the third day, He forms dry land, and then makes plants. Thus, the disorder has been put into order.
Malvolio's a Peg-a-Ramsey.
* Another creates a 21/33 month maximum timeline for landmark and historic district designations. (Under this law, Crown Heights North, the Park Slope Extension, the Grand Concourse, Douglaston Hill, Murray Hill NoHo, and Dumbo would have never been designated since they all took longer than 33 months.)
“In the film The Matrix, Keanu Reeves plays a character who moves in and out of the real world. He might have thought he was having a similar experience while defending a recent legal action in Canada. Reeves was sued by Karen Sala, a woman he said he had never met but who claimed that he had disguised himself as her husband and, over 25 years, fathered her four children.”
Starting at the beginning of this year, each month, I re-landscaped a different section of my rented house’s yard. I purchased fist size river rock, flowers and shrubs and other stuff to make it look nice. All-in-All I think the total cost so far for everything has been around $500. Ok wait, let’s rewind a little so I can give you a synopsis of the house I am referring to. The house that I am renting is as 2-bedroom, all hardwood floor single story family home. It has a laundry room, nice size kitchen with a dining area, a huge living room and two good size bedrooms and a full bath, all for the low price of $1000. I am not saying that sarcastically, as single bedroom apartments in my area go for well above $1300 a month. The lady I rent from is wonderful and sweet. Although she cannot find employment and has some serious health problems she usually finds a way to smile and laugh.
Passing on from Longenecker to others who have argued similarly, we find the same low quality of scholarship, in which the arguments depend entirely upon a few dubious examples, in combination with word-study fallacies. In 1953 Dale Moody wrote an article titled “The Translation of John 3:16 in the Revised Standard Version,” which is often cited by others. At the end of this article he declares that 1 Clement 15:2 (“there is a bird which is called the Phoenix …”) “shows clearly that the above conclusions on monogenes are correct,” because “the Phoenix was neither born nor begotten, but it could be monogenes, the only one of its kind!” Apparently Moody never looked at the passage to which he refers, which explicitly describes how a succession of solitary Phoenixes are begotten and born, by some autogenic process. The passage even decribes how the Phoenix disposes of the bones of its parent. It is “one of its kind” only in the sense that there is just one living at any one time. As we noted above, Clement’s whole interest in this mythological bird lies in its death and rebirth.
The group then had fifteen minutes to write a poem. I suggested they could assume the voice of the embroiderer, the artist, or even the map itself. We had thought that Bishop's map seemed be alive enough to lift off the page. They could try using colour as their main motif, enveloped as we were by lemon, pink, silver, black, as well as kingfisher-blue oceans. They could use place names and their sounds. They could zoom in as Moniza had done, in to one country which was significant for them and write about a personal place, bearing in mind that even the most autobiographical voice in a poem is fictionalised,
Pretty Kristina Danilova, 18, murdered childhood pal Olga Samoilenko in a fit of rage after being told her she was ugly and would never get a boyfriend.
The bartender looked around the room, scanning for any motion. Not a soul moved. The bartender refocused on the stranger and gun he was holding. “It wouldn’t be the first, but I don’t want it to be the last either,” he said as he slowly let go of the club and moved his hand away.
- Stone Cold Steve Austin t-shirts (is he even still alive? was the teenager wearing this shirt ironically?)
Much of the gig was organised via Facebook, and this was a boon, because it meant that punters were able to avoid the stupid admin charges that the ticket-sellers add on. In fact, the whole thing was a great bargain. After paying via Paypal, an email from the band was exchanged at the box office for a ticket on the night, which also entitled you to a CD of the show, and a mention on the cover. Louis certainly isn't going to be a millionaire any time soon working this way, but he will have a loyal fanbase.
This song is a perfect introduction because it shows how the album plays out. The way it flows and weaves its songs together makes it seem like a concept album. For all I know it might be, I can't tell what that guy's trying to say. Not clearly, anyway.
Interviewer: With regard to the new fatwas on women’s issues – every day, we hear such fatwas, like allowing women to lead men in prayer. Where were these fatwas all this time, and why are they being issued now?
My two teenagers in the end were a little bit non-plussed by the whole experience, but still captivated and engaged despite themselves. So much so that we're already planning to spring a Buster Keaton retrospective on the two of them for the next evening when we're all at home. And while they may not have loved the movie as much as their Dad and I did, they did adore the dog!
unsure.
I made these pillows for my sister from fabric she bought on our trip to Hawaii last year (Kapaia Stitchery on the island of Kaua'i, great prices!). These were supposed to be for her birthday in February (oops), but better late than never! I bought pillows from the craft store and just sewed 2 fabric pieces together and flipped them right side out. I slipstitched them closed after inserting the pillow. I bought the blue fabric to make a dress, but borrowed some of it here since I thought it made for a more complete group!
Distress Ink: Tim Holtz - Brushed Corduroy
Atemi
Far from being a document cobbled together by a motley crew of so called “constitutional experts”, the document Kenyans are voting on is a result of decades of peaceful and persistent agitation, propaganda, mobilization by a relay of generations of democratic patriots past and present. Perhaps one of the most poignant reminders of these years of self-less sacrifice was illustrated recently when about forty former detainees, political prisoners, victims of repression and survivors of torture converged at the residence of one of their own colleagues- Raila Odinga, the Prime Minister.
the peril I was in ~
It was coming in underneath the door and bursting up in a fountain from the toilet. He sank back into the sofa, letting his feet soak in the dark, rising waters and switched on the telly. The weather forecast was on. It was raining apparently.
There was silence, judging by the tracks from the trucks they had been working there earlier! The tide was coming in though, so they must have gone home… the path was clear, I composed image upon image, excited and exuberant, it felt like there was not going to be enough time… a photo-frenzy, lol!
Elsewhere, a staff member is ill and needs to be home resting, but she comes to the office anyway, not wanting to burden her co-workers with an overflow of her duties. Ironically, this person is doing her co-workers’ jobs by not letting them cover for her. When she is sick, her job changes. Her duty is not to come to the office and perform tasks, but rather to stay home and recover. Her co-workers’ jobs also change temporarily, incorporating some of her tasks into their daily routine. If this creates a burden for them, then communicating this to her or finding another way to manage the workload is also their job.
I have enough confidence now that even when I feel devoid of ideas if I sit at my computer I’ll be able to write. I prefer to do that earlier in the day for if I don’t, other tasks sap my creative energy. I’ve frequently noticed on the days I struggle the most, on the days when the muse seems to be in hiding, I actually write better. Just like my
because you become a better person
Years ago, I started speaking about the movement that is upon you. Even this day, it has been shown to you as it was transcribed and recorded [earlier in the meeting]. We have said that the Kundalini of the planet is moving. We never used the word serpent, but we do now. This has been the prophecy of the ancients, but not necessarily the ones that are here – for the ones who are hearing this should know that I speak from Peru.
Studying the Scripture is without a doubt one of the most beneficial priorities in my life. I first attempted to read the entire Bible at the age of fourteen; it was a difficult task; at that age I was not an avid reader.
1.) Moving Butterfly Hair Clips
There are a few places I always take visitors to Portland--the Rose Garden, Powell's, and the Kennedy School. If they're into beer, I take 'em to a brewpub or two instead, but for a purely Portland experience, you can't do much better than the Kennedy School. A transformed 1915 elementary school in Northeast Portland, it was an albatross for over 20 years between 1975 and 1997. No one knew what to do with it.
Miles this year: 288.25
I am hoping that my disorganised life will actually become organised once again. But I do feel that there will always be a little part of me that will allow the disorganised to creep back in. I will see how I go.
Message: It’s OK to live in a frat house with 7 guys. What could go wrong?
Enjoy the award ladies and keep cooking!
Seriously the first time I read about Mr. Weiner (pronouced wi-ner, for the record) I thought maybe the story was a joke.. or a SNL skit..
Speaking of love, I have to say I really admire the way that Ms Roth dealt with Tris and Tobias's relationship in this book. Without spoilerising, suffice to say it is real, and difficult, and an exceptionally honest portrayal of love that you don't often find in mainstream fiction. Well done Roth.
Mainichi Daily News
As a Maryland student, you are eligible for up to 12 free sessions of counseling in a 12 month span from the Counseling Center.
After some thinking and staring at the wall I knew exactly what I wanted to do!
To view available homes in nearby Ballantyne area neighborhoods in Charlotte NC:
Many of us know that maturity and responsibility have nothing to do with age.
maybe we should have a cupcake week here.
Have a fabulous, safe evening! I hope you're ringing in the New Year with those you love!
And then there's this. Once again, from Aiming Low
Mr.Churchill said the question was whether it might be wise "to allow public feeling to develop a little more - before takg. action...May be wise to wait...But it wd. be fatal to let it develop too far." (11)
Is $60 a bit pricey and crazy for ten super sized baskets? Yes and no. They were the cheapest option for the Expedits, but absolutely not inexpensive. Although, I felt like I won the lottery when I found them for 50% off and I am positive they will hold up for the long haul. Not to mention that someday when my boys are too big to want and need a playroom, these babies can be recycled to the garage, laundry room, bedroom or even sold in a yard sale...
Covington police set up a videotaped sting after receiving a complaint that mayoral candidate Ronnie Johnston’s signs were being stolen.
The hope of the common man, the eyes that love leaves
Most striking is a statement contained in Canada's Food and Drug Regulations (C.R.C., c. 870), which define different kinds of alcoholic beverages, in this case Tennessee whiskey.
When will he come back to me”
As Kaz Hirai told Develop, “we do business in parts of the world where network infrastructure isn’t as robust as one would hope. There’s always going to be requirement for a business of our size and scope to have a physical medium.”
The fourth reason to study economics is to become an informed citizen. You cannot pick up a newspaper today without reading stories that have an economic impact. The trade deficit, unemployment, a new and improved product, all of these items and more affect our economy and our society. Knowing how these events can affect your job and your income is important in making decisions that impact your economic well-being. The decline of the American automotive industry should have been a foreshadowing of what might be in store for the employees of the General Motors and their suppliers. Still, some employees were surprised when the GM plant closed in Janesville. Economics cannot prevent certain events from happening, but it provides the tools to understand why such events occur and what the effects may be.
People with RLS most commonly experience the pain and discomfort in their calves, but for some reason I get mine in my hip joints. And occasionally I feel it in my ankles as well when it is really bad. I cannot tell you how I hate this condition, which is getting worse as the years go by.
Today we invited my nan, aunt Brennie, and (cousin) Tonya over for a mother's day brunch... my nan and aunt were in for the weekend and I thought it would be a nice way to spend some time with them before they head back home today. I wanted to make something a little more on the healthier side than bacon, eggs, sausage, etc... but still have something everyone enjoyed. So, instead I made blueberry pancakes with added ground flax seed, and on the side had strawberry and banana slices, with vanilla yogurt and cool whip - everyone loved it and said they are happy we had that instead of a big greasy breakfast - phew! :)
What’s your favorite Mexican dish? Post your favorite recipes! And if you don’t have one yet, there’s plenty of cookbooks here at the library to help you get a start!
over and over.
There remains an SPL investigation into “double contracts” and illegal payments, and the SFA appeal process is still to conclude.
(BTW- Sidenote Mommy Rant-
The Gerald C. Wilson Auditorium’s THE Happening Place!
We also celebrated Chad's birthday with his family early this year. His birthday isn't until the 12th of June, but Chad's mom is flying to Denver to help his sister, Meredith, who is expecting her second baby. We went to Dale's, a very yummy Indian restaurant in G-Vegas. Kaden tried his first coconut korma, tandoori chicken, tikka masala, and basmati rice, and gladly accepted repeat bites of every dish offered to him. After dinner, we drove back home and had slices of Joy's deliciously perfect homemade carrot cake. So good. Don't think Kaden didn't enjoy a lick or two of cream cheese icing along with the rest of us.
1/4 cup finely chopped red onion
Here are some of the key elements of a successful award point program:
Simple question, “What are you great at?” Some can sing and others are great with relationships. Solving complex math problems is easy for another, while growing plants is someone else’s sweet spot. We are each endowed with “gifts” that are ours to polish.
In their words, we are fully immersed in a time of ‘change and conflict’. Change comes externally from weather, elecromagnetic fluctuations in the earth’s magnetic field, natural phenomena, celestial disturbance (solar flares) and trauma inflicted by others unable to stop themselves ‘exploding’ their own inner drama. Conflict stirs in the form of personal challenge, grief, bewilderment, depression, anxiety, and fear. Many are going through these experiences at this time.
stopping places along the way. Don't look back.
02 Snow on the Sahara
PetNaturals® of Vermont
There are plans afoot for a new five part series starting with a movie called Caesar. The idea sounds reminiscent of Conquest of the Planet of the Apes. A scientist develops a super intelligent, talking ape who becomes enraged when the scientist’s wife is killed. Caesar begins to despise humanity, particularly their abuse of simians, and plots a revolt. Said revolt should lead to a planet ruled by apes throughout the rest of the proposed series.
If you study the end result of these last two methods for a seamless back (my modified Aldrich and the online one), you will notice that the pattern below the back armscye is actually unchanged in shape. All the change occurs in the shoulder and neck region, and the excess centre back length is effectively being eliminated from the top. This surprising (to me) revelation led me to discover an even quicker way - my adjustment is the equivalent of simply changing the angle of the shoulder and back neck to the rest of the pattern!
DALLAS, March 16 /PRNewswire/ — Hispanic youth marketing best practices are the focus of four new sessions added to the professional development agenda of the Hispanic PR & Social Marketing Conference, May 10-12 in Dallas, TX. The conference, a co-presentation of the Hispanic Public Relations Association (HPRA) and the Hispanic PR Blog, now features an amazing 20 sessions of training.
I hope all of you had a great week! If you didn't than join me on getting back on track. Today is a new day!
Hello! :)
Benson: I am going to have one hundred kids!! (thinking for a minute)... And I think that I will have to drive a bus to drive all my kids around!
o “To ensure economic viability, starting on a small scale within the current economic environment, emerging farmers will no longer, as in the past, be able to start by milking 5 or 10 cows in the backyard.
myself to work, I start to get frustrated.
I'm here to talk a little bit about my experiences on November 9th, but before doing so I wanted to share a few reflections – hopefully not too tedious -- about the role of the police on campus, and about the task of the Police Review Board. I think these reflections will allow my anecdotes about the 9th to be put into a kind of context, and to appear as something other than discrete stories about how campus norms happened to be breached on a particular day last fall.
So every single one of us fed the ground,
surveying the spectacle; the old lady at the
I love the lighting this time of year, Its more muted and warm toned. I could sit outside for hours just soaking it all in as the birds gather and the geese fly overhead. The corn and soybean fields are just beautiful, as the warm fall sun gleams a honey toned cast over it all. Even things as simple as the grass are a sight to be seen. The golden seed head swaying back and forth like stalks of wheat.As everything and Everyone gets ready for the arrival of winter.Fall also means breeding season here on the farm, and getting everything situated in the barn and winterized. And Projects finished before the cold weather hits. And an exciting time as well, as we will be expecting a litter of Great Pyrenees pups on November 1st and goat babies in February and March! As Life dies back in fall we welocome new life in the middle of it all. Exciting times here on the farm.
Anywho, a lint roller works pretty well to clean up, especially all the little pieces that got cut off the grass. My husband doesn’t allow me near the vacuum cleaner (oh darn!) because I manage to break a belt every time I vacuum, so I figured I needed another way to clean up. Plus, I can only imagine it would be quite a disaster to get all that grass stuck around the roller of our vacuum.
The Help
On my walk home I felt like I was in a good place emotionally. I decided I'd go and read my book at the the local taqueria that has a happy hour, hopefully sitting by the window to enjoy the nice weather. I decided to write R a letter telling him I wasn't as angry anymore - and sort of giving him a pat on the back - for making the decision earlier rather than later. I don't think I was ever that angry, it is just easier to say you are angry instead of sad. I drafted the card and I think it came out well. I mailed it off. Only my third communication to him in two weeks. (The first was a one-line email about my scholarship, the second was a two-line email thanking him for telling me about a package I had to pick up at our old apartment.)
THEN . . .
I found this great idea on pinterest that I want to do for the first day:)
“No, I shot him. Bullets and the fall killed him.”
The proverbial 'Bad Penny' .
1 catastrophists--floods
Usually a great majority of people will have very positive results from the session. Some people are more sensitive and can feel a lot of energy moving in their body. Others may not feel the energy but will notice good effects. Before and after the sessions people can feel calm, centered, energized and balanced. They can also feel their pain greatly reduced or eliminated. Like any modality this won't work for everyone but most people see great results.
This could go to my favorites also, but it’s too sheer that it just broke my heart. In the palette, it looks like an orange-red, my favorite kind of red, but it’s a shame it’s not exactly what I expected.
Much of the criticism is shot through with communist propaganda and pejoratives of the day. Lest someone accuse me of being inflammatory, the contemporary critics of the captains of industry were unapologetic leftists, like Eugene Debs, proud socialist. So we at least need to evaluate the situation with this in mind.
Mute Mondays. It was how I came to join this blog community.
We sat in the waiting room a very short amount of time before a nurse (whose name I didn’t catch) brought us back to the procedure room to wait for Dr. L and his nurse, Kelly. The nurse let us know that the procedure goes pretty quickly and that I should be on my way home in about an hour. According to her there was only one possibility for things not going well, “Sometimes with morbidly obese patience we do end up not being able to perform the procedure and we would just send you over to the hospital. There is a chance of that, but it isn’t likely.” When she left I looked at Jimmy and asked, “Did she just say that I’m morbidly obese?” He assured me that she didn’t mean it that way.
(2) Style boards work JUST AS WELL for your engagement/pre-wedding shoots!! :D
Row 3- ch1, turn, (sc in 6, trc around post 2 rows below*belt loop made*) around to last 4, sc in last 4sc.
The stone which the builders rejected
1And after these things I saw four angels standing on the four corners of the earth, holding the four winds of the earth, that the wind should not blow on the earth, nor on the sea, nor on any tree.
Round 3: Ch 3. *2 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Join with sl st to top ch of ch 3. (30 dc)
When Wojciech Szczesny broke both arms, how did he clean his “you-know-what” when he wanted to take a shite…?
Aldridge ‘opines’…“Pre-Twitter, Green was an anonymous journeyman lawyer, who, after starting out at the bar, re-qualified as a solicitor, and completed a series of relatively short stints at several law firms and a government legal department.”
Mother's Touch Digital Forehead Thermometer. This device works by slipping it over your finger, pressing the button, and waiting for it to beep. Then you gently caress your child's forehead. In just 6-8 seconds, the patented technology of the thermometer measures the rate of heat flow from the body and calculates a clinically accurate result. No more poking an ear or sticking a thermometer where you do want to! It also includes a last reading memory, fever alert, and room temperature display and is F or C switchable.
10. BLUE SUEDE SHOES
I only bought a Fishnoodles cover (formerly Hyenacart, now Peachy Green -- why do they keep changing names?) because they had some "seconds" at a reduced price. I purchased a size small -- and boy, is it ever small! It's supposed to fit up to 16 pounds, but I don't see how that's possible. There's no way it would ever fit over my fitted diapers. It is certainly trim, and is very well made, but I just can't get it to work. Again, I might need to try a prefold with this one, but I think even a prefold would be too big! I think I'll keep it for future babies as a newborn cover. The style is the same as this newborn diaper from Peachy Green.
When you are willing to fully integrate all of who you are and all of what you have learned and experienced, without guilt and without shame, you become free. You then begin to align your past, present, and future as simultaneous influences and as the support base for new exploration and conscious choices. Are you ready to take that step (and for some, a gigantic leap)? If so, let’s let Creator provide you with a stepping stone and show you the way.
Because in lieu of having somebody kiss it better, or stick a hello-kitty band-aid on it, I need to garner a large dose of sympathy from the internet.
Without this direction or control of both the debit networks and the financial institutions, Paymentech did not perform or cause to be performed each and every element of the claims. In this situation, neither the financial institutions, the debit networks, nor the payment services provider, Paymentech, bears responsibility for the actions of the other.
Languages/Subtitles: English SDH, French, Spanish
Who had the bottom three dishes?
He couldn't hear the stars
You may think you are saving money but in the long run it is definitely not a way to cut costs.
I was born on November 11, 1992. I have a big sister who’s three years older than me.
And because that wasn't enough for me I've also decided to become an independent beauty consultant with Mary Kay. I just signed up about a week ago and am ready to get going! I've been so lucky to have met a ton of amazing and wonderful women and am just excited to have the opportunity to make new friends here in va and to earn some extra money doing something I love. ♥
If there's one site in Afghanistan that is associated with foreign tourism, it's the Buddhas of Bamiyan. I was lucky enough to have my first trip out of the 'Kabubble' to be in Bamiyan and have enough time after my meetings to squeeze in some of the tourism.
According to the BGH, the impossibility to resolve such a discrepancy between the claim interpretations would lead to a loss of confidence into the jurisprudence as a whole and into the German double-tracked system in particular. This entails a sustainable effect of the decision on the interests of the general public beyond the individual case being sufficient for admitting the revision.
The calls, which typically involve on the order of 100 participants, begin with announcements and reports on developments around the country. On the general call I was on, the reports were from the InterOccupy media group, the InterOccupy tech group, occupiers in Washington and Tacoma who had protested the National Defense Authorization Act, an announcement of planned summer meetings, and brief comments on the anniversary of the self-immolation of Mohamed Bouazizi, the Tunisian man credited with setting off the Arab Spring.
When you are ready to bake the cookies, scoop up tablespoon size portions of dough and roll each piece between your hands until it is as smooth as possible and doesn’t crack at the edges. Space the balls of dough 1-1/2 inches apart and use the end of a wooden spoon to depress the center of each, making a well about 3/4 of the way down and as wide as you like. If the sides crack, push them back together.
Pour ce qui brille, un peu de paillettes sur les ailes de Leisel et sur le coeur, un bouton naturellement pailleté (même si ça ne se voit pas sur la photo) et un petit brillant.
Thankfully, the kit came with a tutorial for putting the bags together.
Who started it? The IDF and the Shin Bet security service did. The impression is that they carry out the targeted killings whenever they can, and not whenever it is necessary.
Eliza finds out of course and the two are finally united in the end of one the nicest, most complex love stories you will ever see.
“For a sunburn?”
If you know your Fulci, then you know that he enjoyed giving the church a kick in the ass on any given moment. My theory is that it's due to the tragic events in his personal life. I can’t really see a creative person being a devout follower of religion, when that religion takes away loved ones. Somewhere that bitterness has to vent, and I’m saying that the way Fulci aimed critique towards the clergy was one of them.
For me, March is about an awakening. An awakening of metal, carbon fiber, rubber, combustible liquids, and the manifestation of insanely complex physics. CAR RACING, motherfuckers. And I mean proper car racing, not that NASCAR driving-around-in-a-circle-with-antiquated-steel-tubs bullshit. In March, the only balls that matter are those attached to the driver. For a petrolhead, is there a better time of year than March? No, no there isn’t.
By Dave Barry and Pearson Riddle
I would be at the mercy of my parents, so I didn't have much choice on activities. I had but one request: on the day we headed back to Portland for my flight out, I wanted to stop by the Allagash Brewery. I've been hearing awesome stuff about their beer for some time, and have been wanting to try it, even before I realized it was brewed in Maine. It's Belgian style! It's bottled conditioned! What's that, you ask?
- made chicken salad for school sandwiches
He never told me when to start.
We begin again at the small green hill that fancies itself a mountain. He’s fine at the start. We get going and I’m smacking floating mystery boxes with my head and stomping down on all my old friends and foes. They cry out in primitive squawks, like this was the first time it happened. There’s the mushroom that makes me giant. Over the pitfalls and under the line of floating bricks we go. The pyramid is up ahead and we scale it with ease.
Hers is the mind that crafts your great horrors.
This kind of beer is all about balance: rich, bready malt backbone, with just enough hop bitterness to keep it in check. Pair one of these with the grilled chicken wrap and garlic fries, and you may just forget about going back to California.
Today I'll like to show you guys, what I'm going to give my daughter for Mothers day instead of a card. He is the newest addition to our family, Little Ronny, the Picture is 5x7. I cut the blue paper to be 10x8 . I used my Cricut with a cart. I haven't used for over 8 months. Even through I like a lot and I use to used a lot too, the Everyday Paper Dolls for the polar bear. I also used Nate's ABCs for the kite. I used Nanas Nursery paper to piece the kite together. Piecing with different paper is one of my favorite techniques. Another one is using stickers and I used Stackabilities from The Paper Studio.
I had gone to a work function – something that would fill me with horror and awful anxiety just twenty-nine days ago – and spent an hour talking confidently with colleagues, drinking just a few sips of wine and LEAVING half a glass.
I have been slightly obsessed and enamored with the Chanel show. Everything from the octopus garden set to that Aurora Borealis white sequined jacket that will most likely wind up in the closet of Rachel Zoe. Pearls peppered the model's hair and face. It was a new level of pretty.
Commenting fortnightly on projects entered into the challenge
6:40- On my home to shower and get myself and the kids ready to get out the door. There is a 50/50 chance that the kids will be up when I get home. If they are not up, I make sure to go wake Brody before I jump in the shower. He's our slow waker. Madelyn is a light sleeper, so it doesn't take her long to follow on her own.
Clothes… I am using old viewer, so simple is better.
I too awaited the expected guest. 230
And I love. Looove. It fell a little flat before I could get these pictures, but I think my new hair and I are going to be friends. I haven't tried styling it on my own yet, but that dear stylist assured me it's going to be all wash-and-wear from this day forward and I should style it only if I want to look extra sleek.
Hirsch, Edward. How to Read a Poem, 1999. Hirsch makes generalizations about poetry, explicates specific poems, and quotes critiques and writers. He says an exemplary poem teaches you how to read it. However, he laments that so many people have become estranged from the devices and techniques of poetry and poetic thinking that reading poetry is an endangered activity, maybe, he says, because reading itself is endangered in our culture. The book includes a glossary and a list of suggested reading.
Another problem at this time was my obsession with music and musical instruments. This was a problem because I was isolated from anybody with an instrument and knew of no musicians with whom I could speak. Once a year at Christmas I was given five bucks(!) and I would go into the mall to buy these great Jazz/rock or "fusion" records. These records - the most exciting being the two record sets with the fold-out photos and designs - provided me listening pleasure for hours, fascinated by the musicians on the covers and their exotic electronic instruments - usually banks and mountains of keyboards. Because I could not play an instrument I would instead try and draw pictures of the instruments on scrap paper with a no. 2 pencil. My drawing skills seemed permanently stuck at an elementary school age, so I ended up drawing flat trumpets and black and white squares for keyboards. Where my drawing came alive was in representation of human hair: all huge afros, beards, and mustaches since I could not draw a proper human face and had nobody to show me. It was almost as if, by drawing the music, I could somehow, through some quality of supernatural MAGIC, become a musician.
Today's hop is full of inspiration from the SCACD design team as well as some special guests designers. I know we have all had a lot of fun creating with these gorgeous new stamps. :) To ensure that you hit every blog on today's hop, make sure to start the hop at Danni 's blog. If you have been travelling along in order, you will have arrived here after visiting with one of our lovely guests, Angela Wood.
I have to ask myself what we would have done if the guy had just walked down the lane and asked for a handout. It’s bound to happen sooner or later. Someone, other than our neighbors, will wander in hoping for a handout. The Gunters did. Fortunately for them, we had enough excess at that point in time to give them a handout. Now, they’re planting their own garden (with some of our seeds). I’m sure we’ll all work together canning for the non-growing season.
Interestingly, those locals who had campaigned so hard against the reception centre but who were invited to look more closely at the issue had their attitudes changed afterwards.³
Photo courtesy of Amy at Amybeads
Ink: Pacific Point (111837)
As I was swinging her, I was repeatedly reminding our daughter to “stay still, don’t move, just let me swing you.” This she understood as, “move at the worst possible moment,” which she did, and which caused her to land on her head. (I am as surprised as you are that talking rationally to a 2-year old did not attain the desired outcome.) This resulted in me carrying a crying girl through a house that isn’t ours while briskly passing curious onlookers. One of those onlookers was my wife, whose immediate look of concern was quickly replaced with a look that said, “I knew I
I love you soooo much!
The decision to end the program, a decision buried in a thousand-page spending bill and announced right before the holidays, destroys the hopes and dreams of thousands of D.C. families. Parents and children have rallied countless times over the past year in support of reauthorization and in favor of strengthening the OSP.
I think some people have pre judged this movie based on this event,they ignore that it has France’s answer to Al Pacino, in Vincent Cassel,there are a million movies that have been made about killing which have showed a gore-fest of scenes without any original backdrop(The Saw franchise)
68. Tao is positioned as Main Rapper, and included in the subgroup of EXO-M.
The whole idea for this post was born from one of those intense arguments I tend to have at work with fellow co-workers, in which no party ever wins, but instead indulges into a never-ending debate that turns to be the highlight of the day. The homophobic wing (those against metrosexuality) was arguing that metrosexual men are gay, and the ME wing (that is only me) was disagreeing with such allegations. Why? Well, mainly, because if that were to be the case, then more than half of Puerto Rico, South Korea and Japan is populated with gay man; and Clooney, Pitt, Beckham, and even Clinton (all which have been given the particular label) should also be considered gay –not that I don’t see the possibilities in the four latter.
17 - Money In My Pocket
Then, too, there's the little problem I sometimes have with sticking to recipes. For every recipe I post on the blog, there are six or seven things I've made 'off-recipe.' Sometimes these are just ordinary, but every once in a while, they're magical enough to send me running for a pen and paper so I can get them down before they're forever forgotten. This recipe was one of those special few.
Just how big are they? Too freakin big if ya ask me! Look at that damn photograph again. Geez……NOW DO YA KNOW HOW BIG THEY ARE!
Even if the sitter has carefully chosen to represent themselves in a certain way (and that, in itself, is revealing), another moment might have made them look very different - have you ever seen a handful of snaps of yourself up on someone's Facebook page after a party, and thought you almost looked like different people, depending on angle, light and so on? A portrait is painted in time and so it's a collection, a distillation, of the artist's conception of the sitter. But a photograph is a step out of time, and therefore - paradoxically - it speaks of Time, and how it moves, as few other artefacts can.
Today, outside of the very backward parts of the world, progress is accepted and expected. We don’t deny the explanations of science or the advances of technology. We value education, and we value what we hope are improvements to our world. Not to do so would cripple us on the world market at the very least.
2 transition
Violets blooming softly in the grass
I suppose it is this kind of unpredictability that makes life what it is. As someone who likes things meticulously planned out, I often struggle with nights like this! Everything turned out well, though - I learned how to play pool...and realized I am quite terrible at it! Ah well, practice makes perfect.
Chew Lips
1. Heat oil in a Dutch oven over medium heat. Add chopped onion and garlic to pan; cook 5 minutes or until onion is tender, stirring occasionally. Add broth, hot pepper sauce, salt, and chicken to pan; bring to a boil. Cover, reduce heat to low, and simmer 15 minutes. Remove chicken from broth mixture; cool.
I mashed the grains at 150° F (66°C) for an hour. I was shooting for 148 to get a more fermentable wort, but I can live with this. I collected 5 gallons of liquor and added the 10 pounds of DME, bringing my volume up to 7 gallons. I boiled for 90 minutes, and at 10 minutes left I added the sugar to the wort.
Let’s take a closer look at what this means. A full-time equivalent employee is defined as either one full-time employee or two half-time employees. In other words, two half-time workers count as one full-timer or one full-time equivalent. Here is another example: 20 half-time employees are equivalent to 10 full-time workers. That makes the number of FTEs 10 not 20.
Thanks Cheryl and Paul for the new lunchbag. It is great and will certainly get broken in soon. My current lunchbag was starting to look a little sad and I was wondering what my plan was. Problem solved.
Naturally.”
Well, the campaign manager said, “You will have no problem from the Sadducees. Any protest from them will be mute and unimpressive. We’ll remind them of how much money you have put into their treasuries and how much their businesses make off the tourism you’ve generated with this magnificent church and all the other buildings you’ve had constructed.
A second residency certificate created by the amendment bill is a grant for “substantial business presence” similar to what exists for direct investment incentives in the Immigration Law.
and they're pretty smart.
I did not want to make it super long but long enough to be wrapped twice around the neck... So I've modified the pattern a bit. And I had two skeins of this green colour to make sure I had enough...turns out I will need all of both skeins.
I put off writing this post because it required me to think of interesting things about myself, which always reminds me of college essays, or worse, online dating profiles. Which leads me to my first factoid-
I can't help but imagine these ferns as stretching and yawning as they slowly wake up from their long winter nap.
Sensational Guitars Of Dan And Dale
The Reformation was a tough time to live through in England. The definition of orthodoxy changed with the monarch and it was all too easy to be accused of heresy. Many fine Christians died as a result, some of them remembered by name and some whose names have been forgotten. In recalling what happened to the more famous people, we also remember those whom only God recalls by name. We can say with John Bradford, ‘There but for the grace of God go I.’
It's harder than I imagined. I thought I was doing nothing all this time since my retirement. Now I know what doing nothing means. I feel bad that I'm not out helping Ross and Patti more. They have taken such good care of me, I'll repay them in time.
Forgive me while I go through a purging process.
Immediately she accepted, grinning at him, enjoying the sight in front of her. The feel of his hands, so soft and warm. Obviously a white-collar worker. Scents of her favorite man’s cologne infiltrated her nostrils causing her pulse to quicken. She loved to lick it off him if she had the chance.
End script.
Last month, 35 hybrids and electrics were on sale, double the number from 2008.
...but then it could only get easier ...right??? Hmmm....we shall see...lol
My arrival was not on your mind.
One thing I found was that Romanians love dogs (OK not all of them, just the ones with dogs!!!) and when I was walking with Golden I would see a neighbor or someone I didn’t know in the street and they would walk up to me with a beaming smile…. Walk past me, totally ignoring me and then hug our beagle and start speaking to him. It actually did make feel a bit insecure when people would rather speak to my dog instead of me. In fact most people would know Golden’s name but not mine. During the doggy walk people would walk past and say “Ce faci Golden”? Although expecting him to reply “bine”
improve blood pressure, increase energy levels and improved bone health just to
Earlier this month I showed you the Erth Minerals Eyeshadows in six shades, but in this post I'll share with you their foundation in the shade 2.3 - which is a pretty good match for my skintone. The coverage is sheer to medium depending on how many layers you use. I don't remember how many I used in the before & after pic... I think it was just 2 thin layers.
C. He Rejects Strength Of Armies vs. 10
Boo has no experience in government administration work, and I sympathize and feel sorry for him as he is facing internal conflicts, so he is unable to carry out his responsibilities as a state assemblyman during the meetings of the state’s legislative assembly.
So not only did my contacts (or at least some of them) get emails from me, but quite a few agents also got spam emails from said hacker. That ought to look real professional. I have changed my password to something way long and I likely won’t remember (LOL).
The Realogy Corp. franchisor has four other affiliated brokerages in South Carolina: Myrtle Beach-based Better Homes and Gardens Real Estate Elliott Coastal Living; Aiken-based Better Homes and Gardens Real Estate Executive Partners; Charleston-based Better Homes and Gardens Real Estate The Beach Company; and Spartanburg-based Better Homes and Gardens Real EstateYoung & Company.
My husband found a very nice suit jacket for 2.95. It was for a costume for the theater, but, hey, he bought it, so he gets to keep it. It looks great on him.
(Also observe the crowd reaction to the repeated “if you love me.”)
Miae Rowe
May that be what carries you through Thursday and into the weekend and beyond.
I recently got the chance to talk to Andrea Frankle about her role in ’21 Jump Street’. Here, Andrea talks about what it was like working with the cast and crew on-set and how she got into acting in the first place…
To explain the physics of the energetic realms, spirit, we need to have a level understanding of physics that is not yet available to mankind. However, it is starting to be understood by our scientists that the physical, low frequency projections, are but a minute part of the make-up of the universe we are currently working with. We can of course work within any of the universes in the multiverse, but where we are now is providing most of the evolutionary acceleration for ourselves, the Source Entity and the Origin.
Shouted Moon as his claws dug deep into the sand!
Red chilli(dry):1
Now, I'm supposed to pass this award on to someone else. And it is with pleasure that I hereby pass it on to that jewelry-crafting, sassy-hooping, smart-dressing blogger Erin over at Work With What You've Got. You rock!
All that being said, I am starting to get a little introspective over the whole situation…have I been a good man? Have I used my talents to make things better for others? Will my son live in the basement forever? I just don’t know…and I guess I don’t want to spend too much time worrying about it, at least not yet. But deep down there is a pull, a tug at my heart, that says (in the voice of the Sham Wow guy): “You better act now, ‘cause we can’t do this all day”. My day is half over.
All three of these items are excellent for storing dry foods for extended periods of time. If you would like additional information on this topic, visit USA Emergency Supplies site for their article Storage Life of Dried Foods for some great information!
Article 20 Any entity or individual is prohibited to emit or dump any exhaust gas, waste water, solid waste or any other toxic or harmful substance to any place of origin of agricultural products.
So, with all that being said - this challenge is designed to gently dip into colour. Instead of the whole colour palette - we pare it down to just one... brown - or sepia.
I replied without missing a beat, “We are sharing the wet cowboy!” Get your mind out of the gutter with hers, it was a steak.
Well, I liked that it seems that Bane has been sent to deal with Batman and that it’s probably down to an “old acquaintance” being more alive than dead. If this is the case, yay.
The meeting with Brower had resolved the final stumbling block and Wilson flew to Libya, where he was to conclude the arrangements for establishing the weapons laboratory and to be on hand to insure the careful handling of the shipment of ”industrial solvent” from the United States. He also would receive the promised million-dollar payoff from Qaddafi. Kevin Mulcahy, meanwhile, flew to Europe for a meeting in London with Terpil and a group of British arms dealers. There was the inevitable party early one balmy Sunday afternoon, thrown by Sven Hoffelner, the trade link to South Africa. Hoffelner had rented a barge and as it was being poled along a canal near Oxford in the bright sun, Mulcahy began taking casual snapshots of the revelry. Terpil saw his camera, Mulcahy recalled, and ”went berserk. He got all red in the face; he was really, really nervous and told me to put the camera away before ‘you end up dead.’ ”
up our product when given the opportunity.
Today’s challenge requires me to think of something I never leave home without. Besides the obvious, driver’s license, money, keys, etc., there are a few things that I can’t possible NOT take with me like:
One last pub-related bit of trivia: in the city’s West End (genuinely in the West End, that is: west of the river Kelvin) is a bar which was also once a Cooper’s store. It must have been one of the earliest outposts of the empire as it was already there in 1904 shortly after Kelvinbridge railway station opened. After operating for years as Chimmy Chunga’s and Bar Oz, it now trades under the name Cooper’s once again.
Rep. Senfronia Thompson has filed HB 1451, the long awaited anti-breeder
I'm 37 weeks today...and still on the couch....Well, for most of the time. I've had to quit my part time job at Circle of Friends a few weeks ago, but there are some days that I can't sit on this couch any longer. One escape from the couch are my last photo shoots this month. I had one last Saturday, this past Tuesday, and one (hopefully) tomorrow if the weather cooperates. So, the next week will definitely be a lot of time on the couch to get these pictures done before life gets insanely crazy!
14.) Bake approx 30 minutes
APPROPRIATE FOUNDATION
I trusted her completely and knew that her efforts from such a long distance will eventually cure me. I began to feel better and better and slowly the meditation, yoga, healing and complete involvement with what I LOVED TO DO became my priority in life.
A ghostly robin
I was astonished to learn in Barbara Eldredge’s “Missing the Modern Gun: Object Ethics in Collections of Design,” that while we have enough guns in this country to arm every man, woman, and child, NOT ONE single design museum in the U.S. has a modern gun in its collection. Talk about denial!!!
What this tells you is that, while the light doesn’t reflect back towards the camera off of the air, when the light passes through the air it gets bent. In other words the air acts like a weak lens. Maybe the thing to do is shine the light through the air towards the camera.
For the beaus out there- peruse the A Bella Speaks pages-you might laugh.
The next time you are in the mood for candy or for an apple, reach for those that have not been coated with “beetle butt juice.” One more reason to shop organic—you will not find any wax coatings on organic fruits or vegetables.
A brisk salty breeze carried the mechanical sounds of the gallows into the gaol. It has come to my attention that this would be the first hanging in the small port town of Crawford; and as such, it is my duty to report all that I experience before I leave back for London in a week’s time. I intend to be the first man to get the full account of a well known criminal and Anthony Davis is my chance at literary genius. Whether or not I will be able to get his full story depends on how long he has before meeting the hangman’s necklace.
To start off, fill your spray bottle with blending solution and then spray your paper till it's wet then crumple it up in a ball:
She's recently taken to sign language. Favorite signs include nurse, eat, potty, more, bird, dog, and cat. I've seen her do a few others but only with some prompting, such as ball and airplane. Her favorite new word (and she only can say about 2 total!) is dada (papa). This cracks me up because we don't say dad or daddy; it's always papa. Still, she announces emphatically that Eric is dada!
"The Rhodes Not Taken" had good romantic development on all fronts, with Finn and Rachel sharing another kiss and Will and Emma having their first disagreement. It was the first episode in which I really felt engaged in the Finn/Rachel dynamic (has "Finchel" caught on yet?), as allllll that angst landed on them.
Dr. Kamal Al-Hilbawi: Allow me. I absolutely do not condone the killing of civilians. But those responsible for the killing of these civilians are sometimes their own relatives and their own country.
Poor journalism.
Revlon Lip Butters: With everything going on this month, I have been super lazy and just grabbing these lip butters. Specific favorite colors have been sweet tart (hot pink), Lollipop (bright fuscia) – I get tons of compliments when I wear this one, and last but not least Creme Brulee (champagne nude). I love these because they are super moisturizing and pigmented and give a nice sheen to the lips.
Cheers to me.
4. Jalapeno cornbread burgers, super quinoa burgers, noochy burgers, and tofu egg salad sammy
blue milk: I love that you see fathers as the great untapped resource in the movement towards kinder, gentler births. Can you expand upon your thinking here?
I was elated to be across that finish line and turned around to look for Derek. I cannot express how important his presence was in getting me across that line in the amount of time I did. One of the most supportive and encouraging frunners there is. Thank you, Derek.
I think, it's not necessary to write in detail about each day or monument I've seen and visited. My camera got broken right after my arrival, so I took some photos just with my phone, but in the end, they have its charm and I can get other "well took" photos from other participants anyway.(at least I hope so).
Yet to adults it means the thing’s too difficult to do.
I set up a blog so I could enter one of said competitions.
Each tide here, indeed an endless artesian supply.
Explore Toronto’s Yorkville neighborhood at the Hazelton Hotel. This 5 star hotel offers both European flair and Canadian style, along with an attention to detail and unparalleled service. The Hazelton Hotel is not only home to a private screening room, but offers a dreamy lap pool, a beautiful spa, and buzz-worthy ONE restaurant.
Another common mistake of a follower is not keeping her own balance, thus dragging the leader out of his balance. A good follower is neither heavy nor too light, neither stiff nor too soft. It's strenuous to dance with a heavy woman, but if she is too light he can’t feel her. It's not pleasant to dance with a rigid woman, but if she is like spaghetti he can’t enjoy her either. A good follower is relaxed, comfortable to hold in the arms, surrendered with slight resistance, self-balanced, and remaining in control of herself. Some women tend to be tense in the embrace, and they release their tension through head or hands against the leader, which causes heaviness on him. Everyone has his/her own way to release tension. It is preferable to release tension through feet to the ground.
I’m majoring in economics and I’ve taken papers at Canterbury and Victoria. There’s no “Neo-Liberalism 101″, there’s no over-riding philosophy at either department that I’ve noticed because each lecturer has their own take on the “best” policies and there’s no “indoctrination” of neo-liberalism amongst students.
We live in the most destructive culture to ever exist. In Derrick’s talks around the country he repeatedly asks his audiences, “Does anyone think this culture will voluntarily transform to a sustainable way of living?” No one ever says yes. If we really accept the seriousness of the situation, what would that mean for our strategy and tactics? This is the urgent question we will be exploring over the weekend.
The Silicon Swamp is not a big city. While it's not really possible to see one from our back porch, on the right kind of night it's possible to see the lights of the big city from the back porch, though. (Those nights are are marked by a cloud deck over the whole state, typically around the passage of a cold front.) I say that so you know we don't have a really good gun and sporting goods shop like Bass Pro or Cabelas* here in town. The nearest Bass Pro is over "in the big city" and is a 2 1/2 hour round trip, not including time in the store. There's a Gander Mountain another hour farther away, so I've never been there.
Maybe because I was thirsty and at that early hour, just wasn't ready for an IPA, Stout, or some of the other styles they had on tap. The waitress brings it out and there's a bunch of blueberries in the light golden brew swirling around at the bottom half of the pint glass. It looked like one of those Asian inspired tapioca pearl drinks you see junior high school girls slurping down at the local mall. Thank goodness the place was pretty empty and only my wife and kids were there to see me drink this totally unmanly foo-foo girlie beer. My nine and seven year old kids laughed and pointed to the blueberries, and I forced myself to laugh with them, but the whole time I'm thinking "Why did I just order this?".
On March 20, 2012, the New Jersey Chapter of NAFA hosted its annual Education Day at the Crown Plaza in Fairfield, NJ. This well attended meeting featured two educational sessions, a mini fleet fair which included your favorite service providers, and a business meeting which included the election of the chapter’s new slate of officers.
proposal under Fayetteville’s Façade Grant Program.
"No. It's just impossible."
If you look at the lower left, you'll see a little system of gears which used to be a bright aqua plastic toy piece which I used the rusting materials on. The little silver circular items hanging from the center of each arch are part of an old window-locking mechanism which I screwed into the top of the box. On the right is an old black faucet handle (and oh, I should have taken a photo of that from the side) sitting on top of one of those great dials from the vintage gas pump I took apart a month or so ago.
Most pyroclastic flows are thought to be gas-fluidised. That is – as well as the pumice and ash, they have a large volume of hot gas keeping the solid particles from interacting too much. That means they flow for ages, and in some cases travel for miles more than expected, even going uphill. These 1975 deposits are from far more unsteady dense flows. The beauty of these is that we have a much better idea of what was going on inside the flow to be able to model it. Hence, for this project, they were a perfect analogue for the first stage of the project **
My sight is set on you, oh Lord, let nothing interfere.
Sir ralph the Rover sail’d away,
And so two people - one called Fergus and the other called Flossie - have become victims of President Mutharika's eccentric leadership.
DILMA ROUSSEFF was tortured; Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva was jailed; Fernando Henrique Cardoso was forced into exile. Brazil’s president and her two most recent predecessors all suffered under the country’s 1964-85 military regime. Yet only now is the country planning a closer look at the crimes committed in those years. By November 23rd Ms Rousseff is expected to sign a law setting up a truth commission, passed by Congress in late October. Its seven members will have two years to examine murder, torture and “disappearances” perpetrated by both the government and the resistance between 1946 and 1988.
She checked the time and it was 9 in the morning. She did not speak to Arham the night before. So she knew that he must be trying her number. Hence, started the frantic search for her phone and she switched it on the moment she found it. As expected there were a few texts from him, asking where she was and why her phone was switched off. She immediately dialled his number and waited for her call to get through. And while waiting, she wondered, if she would be able to hide the uncertainty in her voice from him.
No Sue, I'm not strict. But if I had trouble makers like you, Steph and Nicky then I probably would be.
"My people are broken - shattered!
So we were very keen to squeeze in a weekend away, just the two of us, before this baby arrives. After hearing only good things about the Wotif mystery deals, we decided to get brave and try one, and ended up with a night at the Hilton Brisbane for around $160. We were assigned a Deluxe King Room, but upon check-in, we were upgraded to an Executive King Room! It was very lovely. The Hilton is quite impressive, and in its grand foyer area, we couldn’t stop giggling because we felt like we were imposters who shouldn’t be somewhere so fancy! Our room was also very lovely (with fancy features like a heated mirror which didn’t fog up no matter how hot you had your shower), but the best bit of all was I was with my husband, and we could just hang out, with nowhere to go and nothing to do… unless we wanted to of course.
There was the usual assortment of pretty girls I never spoke to, cheerleaders that annoyed me, and the boys especially that made me draw my accustomed mental blank slate. A few of the dorky ones seemed vaguely familiar.
Initially I was waiting patiently to post my Reveal of the Beading Babes projects...but the deadline for the reveal has been pushed back a few weeks in order to allow enough time for everyone to participate.
When Patty Parks, the WBCH Librarian, heard about our initiative, she asked me if I would consider adopting WBCH for the summer. Immediately I said yes. I figured I can get my feet wet before we go into public schools in the Fall. Chef Sally Schmidt and I appointed ourselves as the main chefs for this summer, although we have an enthusiastic group of chefs and volunteers who already committed themselves to help us during the 7-week kitchen sessions. There are 30 youngsters in the program, so we will have 5 to 6 kids and their parents/guardians in each cooking class. We had our first class on Thursday. Five kids, four parents, and a few volunteers. The produce were harvested that morning, by the kids, from the WBCH Farmlet and produce donation from Shalom Farms. UR kitchen and private citizens have been generous in donating dry goods (still needed on on-going basis) and cooking utensils. This is a Community project. Enjoy some of the photos below. More are posted on Byrd House Market page on Facebook.
Author: Marta Acosta
shake the earth if that is what
Thieves Highway
Now when I was a kid, I was quite sure that scaly crocodilian monsters lurked under the bed and in the dark, waiting to seize the unwary child in their yellow, foetid, unbrushed teeth. So, if you needed to get out of bed in the night, you had to (quietly) roll back the sheets, gather up your knees, and leap, as fast and as far as possible, landing with a slap to the light-switch by the door, because, as we all know, monsters are seared by light, and must snap instantly back into the shadows.
When recently redoing the room above our garage, we decided that we were DONE with the carpet. Our plans were to rip it up, plank the floor, and then paint it. We never expected the plywood planking that we made to look good enough to STAIN!
And let me just say that Melissa Walker has a gift of writing chemistry and longing if she can make me understand and want it to work out when it involves cheating. It's such a hard issue, but she tackled it well, and I am glad that there's the back and forth where we see she learned from it and the ramifications. It's more than just about the boy too, its about a lost friendship.
are green as green as they can be.
1 x 23cm square cake tin or 1 x foil tray approx 30 x 20 x 5cm
19 ow
Throughout the night, the boys continued to terrorize Casey. They took turns back and forth all night long raping, sodomizing and harassing her. They were abusing her senses in every possible way. Jesse reached into his pocket and pulled out yet another pill “You’re going to kill her Jesse!” Billy screamed “I don’t want to go to prison for the rest of my life just for a piece of ass.” Jesse looked down at the pill and thought about what Billy said. He then put the drugs back into his pocket. Casey had lost count as to how many times she had been raped. It continued for hours and they all raped her repeatedly. She was so out of it, at times she thought it all was just a bad dream, but it was a very real nightmare.
Dozens Arrested in Massive Parolee Sweep in L.A. County
I’m also struggling with these feelings of jealously….I wished I was writing other things like how far along am I, or what pregnancy symptoms I would be feeling at this point, or making plans for our family. I don’t like it, because I am genuinely happy to read about others’ BFPs and new pregnancy stories… I really hate how IF forever changes our life perspectives and robs us from being naive and happy-go-lucky about things. I want to smile without worries again. I want to feel my heart flutter. I want to let myself dream about good things. I want to hold on to hope. I want to trust my faith again to start praying for our dreams and wishes to come true. I want to let go and move forward. I’d like a clean slate to start over again.
Canadians in Ontario are Food Ignorant
You just finished it, so why are you still here?
Had I not tasted Thornbridge Jaipur some 18 months ago I wouldn't have drunk some of the great beers I have done since then. It opened my eyes & mouth to different tastes & flavours and shaped my drinking habits today.
I’ve decided I want to blog more. Rather than just thinking about doing it, I’m starting to create a Gratitude Blog right now. I will be posting a daily blog of spontaneous occurrences of gratitude of people, places, and things and feelings on this blog once a day for all of 2011.
"The words the book and films share are these: `You must pay for everything in this world one way and another. There is nothing free with the exception of God’s grace.' These two sentences suggest a world in which everything comes around, if not sooner then later. The accounting is strict; nothing is free, except the grace of God. But free can bear two readings — distributed freely, just come and pick it up; or distributed in a way that exhibits no discernible pattern. In one reading grace is given to anyone and everyone; in the other it is given only to those whom God chooses for reasons that remain mysterious.
does not see black without seeing black itself. There is no being without black. For mysticism, the discourse of humans who cannot live without secret and want to die awake, black is the universal essential mirage of the current age. In a world where the geologic and elemental domain recedes and melts into spectra, like the meteorite in Lovecraft’s tale, black is the present place where the primordially novel—something “from unformed realms of infinity beyond all Nature as we know it”—emerges, something whose obscurity is at once the veil of an unknown clarity—”this new glow was something definite and distinct, and appeared to shoot up from the black pit like a softened ray from a searchlight”—and the bewildering vista of even deeper black, the unimaginably intimate vision of something “whose mere existence stuns the brain and numbs us
What happened to the Apostle Paul after his departure? Let’s begin by looking at 2 Timothy 4:6. He wrote, “For I am now ready to be offered, and the time of my departure is at hand.”
“Watch out! – I am from the evil and hated generation. Believe it or not, not every single teenager around my age goes around beating up people and smashing up cars. Yesterday the Cork Evening Echo wrote an article with the bold title “TEEN GANG MENACE IN CITY CENTRE ” http://www.eveningecho.ie/2012/05/02/teen-gang-menace-in-city-centre/
I didn’t like our room at all! I booked a garden view room with an airline discount with “complimentary upgrade based on our availability at time of check-in”. During check-in the young woman said the place was “pretty full” when I asked about the complimentary upgrade. I called the front desk from the room and asked for another garden view room. The one we got (#169) faced the exterior of the complex and a building. The short bushes make the lanai feel very small and almost claustrophobic. I was told there were no other garden view rooms but that we could upgrade to a pool view room for an additional cost. I said, “If you have available rooms then shouldn’t we get the complimentary upgrade?”. She stated, “That’s not always the case.” I explained to her I had my letter from Ms. Kristelle (assistant reservations manager), which stated if there were available rooms we would get the upgrade. We were immediately moved to 160. Thank goodness we only had to move our luggage down the hallway.
If you are in the Dallas area, you won’t want to miss this chance to learn about Margaret’s research on one of our favorite historical figures. Rest assured, I will be posting all about my experience, I am so excited to meet her!!
on one of our beloved thursdays together, the three of us headed to harris teeter
SO, last night we tried it out - Her and Eliza will share a room..... my thoughts = this could be very interesting! Two silly girls sharing a room.... hmmmm :)
The Entre wisdom is amazingly simple, profound, and biblical. Its not a calculated hype. It works, and was one of the best returns on the money and time I spent in terms of business material to help me grow, and be profitable.
Those transsexual Thai people endure unimaginable sufferings bravely and quietly from as a child and their life expectancy is only about 40 years old. But in their short lifetime they have gotten their family through difficulties and brought the world a lot fun. Many women visitors wonder at their beauties and tenderness. Those beauties are called “Lady boys” or third sex” and more accepted than any other country in the world.
Use the code
I posted a status on Facebook about April Fool's Day and how the expression Op een april verloor Alva zijn bril.
I'll have to write about the "beloved" guardapolvo culture here soon (the smocks the kids and their teachers wear over their clothes). It's quite a topic.
In the distance, Alice could see the path that she had run from. It snaked through the forest going ever deeper into its heart. The light in the forest appeared to be dwindling, yet she found she could see further. The creature limped, dragging her along with it back towards the path as Alice sobbed and made one last futile attempt to break free. As she felt the claws clutching at her arm, she was surprised at how gentle they were when holding her, despite denying her freedom. She was in no pain from the creature. Well, she thought, not yet at least. That part would surely come soon enough.
I wrote about 10,000 words, which isn't a huge amount for a three night stay, but had a very calming time of it, away from my kids and the constant interruptions of home. I had a large, comfortable room on the 4th floor, sat and looked out over the city lights at night, watched teenagers roaming the streets below me, shut my window whenever the sound of car stereos or sirens distracted me.
The blame game continues in Europe over who is responsible for the high-level split over a new EU fiscal agreement. UK Independence Party leader Nigel Farage believes it is time for the British to decide whether they want to stay in the EU.
Naturally, we could argue that literature is underpinned by the type of architecture that could well serve as a template for would-be writers. For Alice..., read similar books such as Peter Pan, The Secret Garden and The Jungle Book. Talking animals already made up the bulk of stories in ancient times, with even a moral thrown in at the end for good measure. Woods have rarely shed their image as the ominous sign where "things happened" (sometimes bad ones, ask Hansel and Gretel and Little Red Riding Hood, for instance). In fact you could even say that literature is governed by narrative patterns that attempt to pin down our infinite human experience into the equivalent of ready-made meals, therefore creating a limited variety of plots. The city that is in danger and needs a hero to rescue it (The Pied Piper of Hamelin), the woman who is in love with a man her parents disapprove of (Romeo and Juliet) But a verbatim replica like The Italian Job (the original, a 1969 cinematic vehicle with Michael Caine and Noel Coward, the "modern" version from 2003 with Mark Wahlberg and Donald Sutherland, transported to L.A. and minus Caine's iconic "You're only supposed to blow the bloody doors off!")? No.
gorgoroth – 2010 carioca club, sÃo paulo, sp brazil 05.09.2010
"Mechanix" (Mega were opening for King Diamond).
Benjamin Netanyahu is under tremendous pressure. No World leader defend the the Biblical connection of the Jewish history. Only Netanyahu. We must pray that Jesus will appear in Netanyahu’s life, and display to Him who King Messiah is.
I just want the sun
The first twenty minutes were a lesson in why soccer is, at all levels and ages, such challenging sport: despite some questionable calls by one of the refs, several opportunities were created by Diablo FC’s Team Thunder offense, only to have the tiny goal keeper for Arsenal repeatedly crush rising hopes. Midway through the first half, a fine shot by an Arsenal player put them ahead 1-0.
Well, I tried to teach myself to knit twice. The first time, I don't think I got beyond a row or two of knitting a garter stitch square-- then I gave up on it for a while. A year later, I tried again (and had to re-learn how to cast on and knit), and it stuck. If you count that first garter stitch dishcloth as my first project, it took me a day or two-- started it one day, finished it the next. ((g) That's kind of hilarious. The thing is tiny. Today, I could finish it in no time-- certainly in one sitting.)
Maria's Taco Xpress.
But if anyone can do it I figure it’s me. Hell, being from a childhood that included a mother with mental health issues, 3 grade schools, 3 high schools and 2 colleges as well as 6 years of Army National guards being the new kid on the block was a lot tilty and just the way the world operated.
+ It volumizes. Hello thick and fluttery lashes!
Overall = 3.8
OK, not quite - but in effect they might as well say that.
Anyway, long story short, don’t read Cracked. It’s pretty awful and apparently some guy wrote a thing awhile back telling us ladies that misogyny wasn’t so bad because skyscrapers. No, really.
Here's the link to the recipe, enjoy :)
That had to be Black Pudding?!
On the other hand, when we feel contraction, that’s like a red light telling us to stop whatever we’re doing and not move forward.
Huey Lewis – Hugh Craig
- This is wheat…
Hope that helps.
But with the help of a lactation specialist, and through supplementing, we got the hang of it, and she started gaining beautifully. She was and is, to this day, our little miracle.
He also said that Kedaya Telang Usan had been identified as one of the areas with high poverty rate in Baram.
So, I owe a huge thank you to Dorie, not only for writing this book which brought so many of us together, but also for her support of this group over the years. I had the privilege of meeting her last year, and she truly exceeded all expectations. Thank you also to Laurie who founded the group, and all those who have helped her to keep it running all this time.
Heard your determin’d voice launch’d forth again and again,
END 11:54 A.M. EDT
angst of another day of bum life
Wizards and werewolves and vampires and all of the rest of it will be fair game (as usual), but anything that remotely smacks of traditional religion-- or even un-traditional religion-- will be attacked and excoriated by the new militant Geeks® and Nerds™, their heads full of vague swatches of Dawkins quotes they read on t-shirts while in line for nachos at an anime con or at an apparel vendor at San Diego.
Pretty zippy feel to it. The body is bigger than usual because it's unfiltered, but it has pretty good carbonation that makes it feel a little faster. It's also on the slightly high side of bitter for the style. Not overpowering, and not really unbalanced, but just tipping toward bitter. Not sure at what stage they stopped filtering, but it almost tastes wet hopped.
Luther offended the pope and other Church leaders even more when he refused to recant. Luther was told to appear before a council for trial. Luther’s friends told him not to go, and they reminded him of John Huss. Luther went even though he knew that he could be executed. He wasn’t executed.
Peg Leg and her new mate nested on the far side of Blacktail Ponds, far enough away that we had to scope carefully to verify it was Peg Leg over there. All seemed to go well for a few years and then our sightings became spotty. 2009 she flew over the ponds alone and calling, calling as if to locate a missing mate. We didn’t see her in 2010. We assumed we’d seen the last of her.
This week I got to splurge a little bit with work and received a makeover from the NARS international makeup team with my boss! It was definitely fun to do something out of the ordinary and extremely girly. My make-up artist was from Texas, was super friendly and got very excited when I told him he could go wild and do anything he wanted. He almost jumped for joy that I didn’t ask for the “everyday-look” and immediately started dancing while shouting “smokey eye smokey eye smokey eye!” So, I really had no choice. I think my favorite part, besides having someone oo and ah and how “beautiful” you look with all your new make-up on, (Thats part of their job description to say that but I don’t care) was the names of the products. They vary from raunchy, to feminine, to demonic, which happened to be what he used on me. Not so sure how I feel about that, but it was very entertaining.
Thanks for coming to look :) this is the first tissue roll book I've made and it was going to have inspirational quotes on the tags, but I changed my mind and thought someone could do what 'they' liked with it.
2) Puppet mayors of Tammany Hall, driven by corruption, though occasionally by sudden late-day resistance against the powerful Democratic machine that put them into power
“EKOS (and especially pollster Frank Graves) was severely criticized and maligned after the election for his (at the time, incorrect) seat projections. Turns out he was much closer to what should’ve been the actual outcome than most people will give him credit for. He was well within the margin of error. Frank and EKOS were right all along — their prediction models saw this coming before it even happened. Kudos.” ~Brian-Michel LaRue
behind clouds; and the same moon shines
In many ways the stave churches received their fatal blow in 1851 when it was adopted a law which commanded that churches should have seating for 30% of those parish to the church. It was often difficult to expand the old stave churches, and besides, they were old, dark and cold. Therefore the old churches were torn and a new larger church was built. This is the background of the demolishing of stave churches in the period 1851-1890
i'm not the best at joining clubs, at deadlines, at rules or guidelines, anything like that; i never have been. consider me a good example of the proverbial wallflower. but this project, along with another i did with 24 fellow artists about self portraits that teesha moore organized, is something in which i'll always be honored and grateful to have been included. the artwork is phenomenal; there are pages that i'd love to cut out and hang on the wall, but i don't dare ruin the collective format within those heavy pages.
O inhabitants of the earth!… For it is time!~
We know that our old self was crucified with him in order that the body of sin might be brought to nothing, so that we would no longer be enslaved to sin. (Romans 6:6)
This is an old joke (to me), but I haven't put it on the blog before, and here we are at J. I couldn't find the picture I wanted of me in a really nice yellow dress, but this one will do.
I think this was where things started to slow down for me. I was really on a roll & solving problems as they came up, but then we moved. Packing, moving, unpacking, & settling in took over and I really lost my motivation to finish this.
but the LORD helped me.
No, this is not the first time I have seen a TV or used a computer.
If there’s ever any damage to the top, it will be easy to sand it down lightly and reapply the oil. I will probably do a few more coats of the tung oil for an extra strong finish.
Get your heart right and continually check yourself! Make sure you are progressing towards the correct goal.
It started with a trip to the Dr. He'd been putting it off for awhile but decided he needed to go.
Spooky not only made an impression, he had a way of leaving a mark in a permanent sense. He had already attacked my forearm numerous times, seizing my hand in his teeth and kicking down my forearm with his back claws. More than once a concerned friend would ask if I wanted to talk about anything. Eventually I realized that it looked like I’d been trying to slash my wrists in a very disorganized kind of way. (He also managed to kick me in the collarbone and left me with an inch and a half long scar that really puts the gangsta touch on wearing a shoulderless evening gown.)
I'm very happy with it in general. I don't think that I will sell it anytime soon. It's super sweet but it's also black so I can wear it on many occasions.
With the captain's armband pulled up around his bicep, Martyn Barnett, drove us on for a winner, in what was another confidant display in the centre of our midfield, which was dovetailed nicely by Kristian Hewitt, who played alongside him. Running on the fumes of his healthy appetite for goals, Barnett nearly won the game for us, surging beyond Netley's last defender at an angle that still favoured the goalkeeper's hands. His left foot shot looked set for the bottom corner, but sailed narrowly past the far post. A draw wasn't a bad start to the season. We hadn't set the world alight, but showed grit and resilience in the face of defeat with another late goal.
According to the Society for Assisted Reproductive Technologies, the number of in-vitro fertilization (IVF) cycles performed for women under age 35 increased by about 9% between 2003 and 2009. During this same time period, the number of IVF cycles performed for women aged 41 and older increased by 41%. But this procedure doesn't always result in success.
Celebrity Theatre
4. Heat up 3 tablespoon of oil and stir-fry chopped spring onion, minced ginger, garlic and
to the ' We'll just turn away 1,500 people in Washingston state' - just cause.
The 2011 Birkhauser Floor Plan Manual Housing is the 4th revised and expanded edition of the publication that has already quite some tradition. The first edition was published back in 1994. For the fourth edition the editor Friederike Schneider is joined by Oliver Heckmann as additional editor.
Salmon farmed in open pen nets are now the source of 50% of the world’s salmon (hatchery fish account for about 30%, and wild fish provide the remaining 20%). Flooding the market with fish-farm salmon has resulted in a drop in the fisherman’s asking price for wild salmon-a price decrease that has forced many small fishing boats off the water.
November 5, 1993
the king of light.
After that we have to get packing. Half of our stuff will go in my mothers basement, the other half in an uncle’s garage. Our moving boxes are free since we are getting them from the SAQ where my father works. Don’t be afraid to ask grocery store and alcohol store if they give their delivery box. Our furniture stays at the old apartment since we rented it furnished to a french student for two months.
The following also received awards at the May 10 ceremony in the Buffalo Niagara Convention Center:
Last year I posted a blog about GMTV presenter Kate Garraway’s campaign to raise public awareness about surrogate breastfeeding by posing for a picture of her apparently breastfeeding a calf. Her point was, why is giving human milk to a calf more shocking than giving cow’s milk to a baby? Of course, it caused outrage and I think this was because of the same inherent essentialism that seems to be violated by these acts. Most of us simply don’t want to cross the animal-human boundary when it comes to acts of intimacy.
Counsel Magazine has an interesting article by Andrew Neish QC, dealing with the lack of diversity at the so called ‘magic-circle’ sets. I’d like to link to it but Lexis-Nexis thinks I should pay to do so and, as I get my paper copy anyway, I won’t. If you or your institution has an account then this is the link to the click-on.
Q: What do you mean by “sold by garbage”
But it was cool, the skin was like rubber. I remember finding snake and crocodile eggs when I was a little girl, the shell felt just like that!
She describes healthy community as having “not only nurture for its members but also openness towards new members, new ideas, new ways of living. A healthy family is not a closed circle; it reaches beyond itself in interest and concern or its spirit will die.” We cannot be exclusive and be a truly healthy community where “all are equally heard, valued, and nurtured.”
Red Planet Prize (2007 announced 2008)
I used ‘Lost’ and ‘To Make an Ogre’ (we wrote To Make a Dragon). The children loved all the dragon work – we also used ‘How to Train your Dragon’ for a long unit on persuasive writing (adverts, posters, leaflets and letters).
005.097/100 YUSUFALI: Allah made the Ka'ba, the Sacred House, an asylum of security for men, as also the Sacred Months,
Step 3: Cut out your shapes.
But despite many services that are being delivered to all refugees in terms of education, Sudanese women are falling behind the fast and free learning here in Australia. This creates constraints for those women in terms of job interviews, using banks, hospitals and transport services and liaising with Centrelink. This is not a simple problem and no one is to blame for it, except the causes of the original conflict and Government negligent in Sudan.
“Perfect for me! If she chickens out, no loss; if she doesn’t, I get a date.”
A famous foodie who lies about being the perfect domestic homemaker entertains her boss and a war hero at Christmas dinner in a snowy and idyllic Connecticut farmhouse setting (which was also used for the film Bringing Up Baby). The film stars Barbara Stanwyck as food journalist Elizabeth Lane and Dennis Morgan. And in true Hollywood fashion, the film was remade with Dyan Cannon, Kris Kristofferson and Tony Curtis.
Clegg wants ‘tycoon tax’ to trap rich who pay less than 20% with fury raging over child benefit axe – By James Chapman – UPDATED: 11:44 GMT, 10 March 2012
Now, on the good/realistic side, the orc archers in the towers obey all of the line of sight rules, so you can find safe spots in the courtyard. Still, for a group that was lower level and facing a fully aggro courtyard, going could be a bit rough. You might find yourself exposed to fire from above at a critical point and not find cover in time.
I can't wait to find time to finish it this week! I'll for sure post a picture. But it's been a good lesson to learn - you don't know if you can do a project unless you try. It may take more time, but it takes a LOT less money and you get such an incredible sense of accomplishment. I realized I didn't simply copy the Cost Plus art. They gave me an idea, and I made it my own. The result is something I'd much rather hang in my house.
I'm glad he's not proving to be an adrenaline junkie or anything.
Your DNA knows that well. It is constantly reflecting your vibration back to you thru the field we call our life.
Please email me at am220099@gmail.com & I will send you the gift certificate via email.
Legendary models of the postwar era, the Mercedes was 600, a large sedan, which was also known as “Adenauer Mercedes gebrauchtwagen”, or the elegant and sporty convertible Mercedes 300 SEL. Mercedes has always been considered a guarantor of high quality cars that were in demand because of their high durability, not only as new cars, but also as a used car lot. The 190s, which was introduced in late 1982, marked a new beginning in the strategy of the company. Henceforth, the offer has been extended downwards, not to everyone’s delight.
I took my five year old the next time I visited and she had no trouble riding the paved route on a singlespeed BMX. Great family-fun and a safe short-cut between suburbs that I suspect is only known to the locals.
It’s a nice warped combination of controversial philosophy, four to the floor dance crossover tunes, and downtempo textures don’t you think?
WIGAN INSULTS
The business and investor community, along with consumers, have reacted predictably. Trillions of dollars are sitting in corporate accounts as business leaders wait to determine the impact of Obamacare and other legislation. The banks, too, are hold off making loans for fear of inflation or deflation. Anyone paying attention knows that the Federal Reserve has been printing money day and night since the 2008 housing mortgage meltdown occurred.
Lately I’ve been eating as many morels as my wallet will allow, and when it comes to cooking them, my best advice is this: keep it simple. Many people like to add minced shallots or garlic, or a squeeze of lemon, or chives, or wine, or whatnot, but not me. I say, let ‘em be. Their flavor is delicate, nutty, and fleeting, and it needs only butter and a little cream to coax it out. I cooked some today with a small shallot – which is pretty classic, recommended by countless recipes and cookbooks – but its sweet, pungent fragrance just smothered the poor things. From here out, I’m sticking with my usual, bare-bones method, outlined below. It’s only a rough guide, and you need not really measure: you could use more or less of nearly any ingredient, and the end result wouldn’t suffer. You could even use another wild mushroom, if morels aren’t available.
Specifics is key.
I can't put into words how much I love my new job, how much I love seeing his face everyday, how MUCH I love my son. While he came without a manual (oh how I would love to have one), he is soooooo worth every trial and tribulation.
Investors, get in contact with someone competent to review the stability of your finances- not by virtue of a TV show or a government license, but by virtue of clear competence as in a long, verifiable track record of accuracy in regard to identifying risk and opportunity well in advance of the majority of the mainstream. Also, do not just stop at someone competent in forecasting, but invest in the services of those familiar with the specific ways that you can put your gratitude for your financial abundance into practical ACTION.
Are my memories due to the photo album
“It figures,” I thought. The smoke detector in the master bedroom is located about halfway up the vaulted ceiling. I decided that if I was going to replace one battery, I was going to replace them all. No sense in lugging the ladder up and down the stairs more often that necessary!
Today you lost your last,
Then he got in his car and navigated the madness of Los Angeles highways, thankful only for the time it gave him to think about what he would say to his family. Later, consumed with the grief of losing a son, Griffin drew the drapes in his bedroom and made his world mimic the darkness in his heart.
thought we'd start a fun new tradition here on the blog today - it's mid-month & what better-a-time then to thank you all for coming by & playing!
Not that that excuses you if you then say, well I’m just an innately nasty, selfish, greedy person, so therefore allow me to be that person!
FLUTTERING, PAIN IN THE HEART AREA, OR BREATHING PROBLEMS: This is a symptom experienced when the heart chakra begins to open or enlarge to receive more energy. Pain sensations in the heart and not being able to breath can be very frightening because you may think you are having a heart attack. The above symptoms are caused by the expansion of energy running through your solar plexus and heart chakra (heart and stomach area). The best solution is to relax which will adjust the energy flow. Anxiety and fear only constricts the energy thus, causing a more severe reaction. This is a normal experience when undergoing a frequency increase.
Seeing they had lost interest and knowing them covering themselves with grass would only end in some sort of allergy reaction, we knew it was time to go.
So why the endless efforts to have subscribers (Be it RSS feed, Google reader, Twitter, Facebook, WordPress etc.). Well for all those people selling something, increased visitors equals increased subscribers, and subscribers equal increased sales. Also, subscribers agree to receive your marketing materials, and are therefor more likely to buy. Making subscribers gold.
It took a lot of forgiving in the beginning. I’d forgive, and then an hour later, I’d find myself thinking bitter thoughts, so I’d forgive again. Sort of like washing my hair. You know: lather, rinse, repeat. Only this was: forgive, release, repeat. Finally, I could go half a day, then a whole day. It takes practice, but it is so worth it. I certainly did not want to feel connected to my abuser(s). I learned how great it felt to be free, so I became committed to forgiveness. Now I practice it as a regular part of my life to keep my friendships in good shape and to release myself from bitter thoughts.
takes the salty secretions of Yemenjà into his lungs,
I’m allowing myself to be happy no matter what anyone else is doing.
I know she used to go pink if Dad ever brought this tale up - and I can't say I ever remember her being very keen on port either!
(Harry Potter!!!!!!)
By contrast, those who amass great fortunes through speculation may merely be lucky. Unlucky speculators are usually sent packing to Peoria and so disappear from the finance pages, something statisticians call "survivorship bias." We don't see the unsuccessful speculators and so wrongly assess the skills of speculators in general by putting too much weight on those who've survived to be counted and therefore read about.
‘Hey, Angela, we’ve found a way for you and Ian to have your two days off together,’ our supervisor informs her.
Grandma did also another wonderful thing: before she would cook the eggs, she would take her old nylon socks and do the following:
That simply isn’t happening and, so far, we haven’t been able to get any assurances that it will. Thus, s12 Children Act 2004, which empowers the Secretary of State to create children’s databases via regulations, remains in force and construction of Contactpoint’s nasty little sister, the eCAF database, continues. This is to hold and share the personal profile, or CAF, of every child seeking council services – around 4m children a year.
Speaking of the business plan, I have been looking into service trailers, and one can be made that is a 23 ft. by 8 ft., to my specs for no more that $15 K. I just need a brilliant idea about how to raise that money. Someone to come up with something the kids and I can do to do it. I need an epiphany of Christ.
Day before yesterday, I was watching a National Geographic documentary on the creation of Earth. It said that about 400 billion years ago, there was only gas. Gas started spinning and fire erupted. Then from fire, water arose and then the Earth was formed. I suddenly realized, ‘Oh this has been said in the Vedas! What new have they said?
LudoBites is a really fun concept: at his whim, Chef Lefebvre takes over the kitchen at some restaurant for a very limited time, and creates a full menu of shareable items, all with his signature mix of the best ingredients combined in unexpected ways. When I got there, the air seemed charged with the collective excitement of all the diners who made it into the fleeting pop-up. The T-shirt-clad waitstaff provided excellent service, and affordable carafes of tasty house wine (in addition to a list of wines and beers) made you feel that, despite the high caliber of the food being served, this wasn't an ostentatious meal. Our group of six ordered everything on the menu, and were treated to a string of strange and wonderful tastes and textures.
"Who can we trust?"
Wicked stepsister. Check.
During the last decade many libraries in higher education have actually tried to use indicators in their daily work. Vestfold University College is an outstanding example. But their experiences are not part of the process. Our failures and successes are analyzed, compared and brought into the open professional debate. We do not learn from the past.
Mike points to one of Ken Anderson's many concepts for the Haunted Mansion, back in 1957. According to this version, the house is actually a hundred-year old Southern mansion relocated in its entirety to Disneyland, supposedly intended as an innocent historical set piece for New Orleans Square. But as luck would have it, the house is haunted ("Bloodmere Manor"), and all restoration attempts are thwarted by the unhappy ghosts. Not only that, but it always remains night within the house.
JANETTE
edges must be rounded. All control ends must be an integral part of
I am happy to say that I have finally found something that works for us! (for now) I'm sure I will have to edit this or find something new when the new baby arrives, but for now this is working splendidly for us!
Her and Daniel dreamed in University about being able to use their art to provide jobs for others and create a bridge for sharing the gospel. “We have dreamed about an opportunity like this for so long, but to run a true business in Uganda is expensive. You must have the proper government papers and lawyers. Because we get paid so well by you, we have been able to save up so that we are now a registered business here.” Their next savings goal? They want to buy land and build a house large enough to have an art studio, sewing, and jewelry workshop. “In this way, we can provide well paying jobs for so many people. You know, for the first time we are not being exploited. We are
A comprehensive range of internal and external investigations were conducted by experienced vets who came in to work alongside Noah’s Ark staff, including blood tests, x-rays, scans and tissue samples.
The wallpaper was installed by the home’s previous owner, and Katie is trying to work around it for now. To downplay it a little, a memo board was installed across the length of the desk. (I’ll share her tutorial for this tomorrow.) To freshen things up, we changed out the desk chair to something more neutral and used lots of simple, white office products from the See Jane Work Basics line. This is the result:
7-7-07. Certainly wasn’t the luckiest day of my life. ‘Nuff said.
My mother frowned but said nothing, a hand still holding tightly to my shoulder as she surveyed the suitcase on the floor, the airline ticket stubs on the nightstand. "You've had a long day. Now you should just rest."
While most here follow the pahari (hill) version of Hinduism, there are packs of Buddhists, Muslims, Jains and Christians, all living in harmony.
My pain is from a couple of nasty herniated discs in my lower lumbar that are also agitating my left hip.
It was Jacob's "hopsital" as Hope so adorably calls it. Jacob is getting out next week! He is doing awesome and they are ready for me to come and get him!
They are giving the winner 3 packs of die cuts of their choice.
Lastly, I promise to keep you updated on my journey in the most interesting way possible but if I get boring then tell me!
This is where Daisy Fothergill, a 22-year-old stripper who is one of Stick's "girlfriends" comes into the picture. Stick offers her money to provide Nard with an alibi for the day in question and she willingly accepts, even though she's not a very good liar. She thinks, "I'll just tell this to the investigator, and that will be that." She does it simply because her mother needs the money and she can not make enough being just a stripper.
I've just been musing on character names. I put a good deal of time into selecting names for my characters--perhaps more than I ought--and I'm not sure sometimes where to draw the line.
The Char Minar is situated deep in the old city of Hyderabad, it took me 30-45 mins from my residence in Hyderabad (which was outskirts of Hyderabad near the IT city).
I leave for Syd on Tuesday and before them I have an impossible number of things to do.
07 Never Rain 21:10
And here is a new saying for you: Quit happens. By this I mean it happens inside a person. If you have already decided that you definitely want to quit something, then the quitting has essentially already happened. The physical act of leaving a team or not showing up for an activity is secondary to the mental quitting. Think about this the next time your child says he wants to quit something. If his mind is made up, then he has already quit. You can force his body to go to soccer practice, but you can't force his mind to like it.
Bell’s Expedition Stout – MI – 10.5% ABV
I love that Jonathan is being trusted to be the first face
Roll to a 1-inch thick circle. Transfer to baking sheet and cut into 6-8 wedges but don’t separate. (I've cut them into as many as 16 pieces when I need more to share.) Bake 25 minutes at 400 degrees.
And it is the middle of the night in America.
My favorite event, since I never make panels was the Cosplay Burlesque. This was my thrid year in attendance, the first being at I-Con 28 hanging out drinking with Kira Buckland. What a cool voice actor if you ever get the chance to meet her. And then once again at I-Con 29 when we returned to SBU. It wasn’t until this year however that realizing as Commitee I can enter and leave the room that I decided to hang out in the back of the room watching rather then taking a seat. And that proved to be amazing. I ended up hanging out with a few of the performers during the show and spent a nice chunk of time talking with Valorie who started it all and asking her a few questions. She was really cool to talk to and was just casually joking with me as we watched the show, before she went on and in between acts. There was another girl who I got a moment or so to speak with but not to any great length. I truely can’t complain though, one of my favorite parts of conventions I think is getting to meet guests, and hang out with them a little bit. It makes the weekend worth it. The MC’s are always great, same two guys joking around just having fun. Overall if you can look them up. I only know them as Cosplay Burlesque but what a great act they put on!
Rosy Regards B1369 (stamp set used for the flowers)
Border: Die namics Die
“Mace-Wielder” (Gadādhara) is a name of Kṛṣṇa as a warrior and identifying him as Viṣṇu, who carries a mace (club) in one hand.
When did I become my mother - or better yet, when did my children become me? I have to laugh at their admonishments because they echo the conversations that I used to have before introducing my mother to my friends, who always thought she was wonderful.
Read the bible with a historical eye and you can see why things are in there as they are. This isn't about what some god wants, it is about what the controllers of a now-dead civilization feared in losing the control of their people to the culture of another now-dead civilization.
There are so many things that come against us in life isn’t there? Cares of the world, certain sins or strongholds that beset us, and then there’s just life on life’s terms itself. These things I guess could be called or known as “infirmities”, and it’s good to know that I’m not the only one who has them. It’s also good to know that there are much stronger men and women of faith who have struggles, cares of the world, and infirmities that beset them. Paul was one such person, and he wrote two-thirds of what we read today as the New Testament.
It's been three weeks since you've made all those resolutions.It's said that it takes 21 days to make a new habit, so you've probably already broken your New Year's Resolutions. I say - FORGET THE RESOLUTIONS! Let's have a giveaway hop instead!
Matthew- He works for us
Romney, check. Gingrich, unfortunately check. The other two are Santorum and Paul, who threatens to be an applecart bouncer and run as a third-party candidate, which would be delightfully European of him. You would think that Paul, who dislikes all government except the part that deals with guns and missiles, would eschew corrupt European ways, but no.
Best Picture winner: All About Eve
Launched as "Homemint," a collection of home goods and art curated by JT and interior designer Estee Stanley, the line can be found at the website and launches this spring.
6 cups of white vinegar
If it appears that Germany is faced with a non-cooperative France, then peace should be made in the east. The German fleets must quickly occupy the North and Norwegian Sea in face of the French threat. Germany must launch a three-prong attack. The armies hit Belgium and Burgundy, convoys should be made onto French-occupied England, and an out-flanking action through the North Atlantic and Clyde should be attempted. Here again infiltration through the French line is basic for success. The gains from France, in addition to previous gains, should be enough to guarantee the German victory.
I used all of these products for 2 weeks and i just loved them. I first used Flushy and let me tell you that
e) other dramas.
To whom however came hard times?
At this point, it usually work to uncover the beans and let them air dry for awhile.
When we deny our creativity and our potential, a little bit of us dies; emotionally, psychologically, creatively.
In our new summary of Chris Brogan and Julien Smith’s Trust Agents: Using the Web to Build Influence, Improve Reputation and Earn Trust, the authors repeatedly emphasize the need for companies to be more human toward their online customers. While yelling at one another is certainly a human action, it’s probably not what Brogan and Smith had in mind. In fact, this situation is a perfect example of how trust gets broken online. It also demonstrates the exponential power of one poor customer service interaction. The actions of Evergreen’s VP toward one customer now have 4,300 people lining up online to take their own shots at the company. You can only imagine how much the VP wishes he’d never hit “Send” on his rage-fueled e-mail.
This is a particular pet peeve of mine, but I'll try to keep my discussion here somewhat reasonable. Proxy detailing seems to me a rather recent phenomenon (and by recent, I mean the last several decades) as advertising and brand recognition have allowed it to be at all useful.
Furthermore, he will still have his trusted Defense Minister, Ehud Barak, at his side. Barak is seen as unlikely to fare well in the elections, and may not even retain his Knesset seat, but would retain the defense portfolio until a new coalition is formed.
Happy Thursday, everyone! The long weekend is almost here!
They may or may not read this I'm not too fussed
bluets, violets crowding out the tufts
Inasmuch as such statements have been given wide publicity through the press and are misleading public opinion on this subject, therefore,
I'm amazed that they continued to brew for as long as they did in the Meadow Brewery. 7 quarters is enough to brew 28 barrels of normal strength beer. Which leaves the annual capacity of the brewery at around 8,000 barrels.
Odell Brewing Company Bobby
Adding regular blueberries would just seem perverse, however. Blueberry muffins and lemon poppy seed muffins are separate genres. It would be wrong to amalgamate the two.
and clean clothes!
It should not be denied that fracking is highly disruptive of the underground environment and its stability in highly unpredictable ways. After hydrofacking began in the vicinity Arkansas’s Faulkner County a swarm of unexplained earthquakes (including the largest earthquake in Arkansas in 35 years) began along a previously unknown fault line. Since they began in September 2010, there have been 843 earthquakes, close to about three earthquakes a day on average. (Bonnie 'Prince' Billy's Earthquake Ballad, Heard on All Things Considered, July 8, 2011, Michele Norris.)
Thanks for stopping by Blue Sky Confections!
A) At least count, she has 123,536 friends -- easily qualifying her as a "Myspace Celebrity".
real soon
The stories take place in a post-apocalyptic North America where there is now the country of Panem. Panem is ruled by "The Capitol", which is surrounded by 12 outlying districts that all exist to support the Capitol. The Capitol is a terrible dictatorship and after an uprising in the now non-existent District 13 seventy four years earlier, the Capitol devised The Hunger Games. Each year, every district is forced to draw the names of one boy and one girl between the ages of 12 and 18 and these children will be sent to a large and creepy outdoor arena devised by the Capitol to battle it out for the death on live TV. Only one child is allowed to live. They do this to remind everyone in the districts that the Capitol is all-powerful and to keep the Districts submissive and scardy pants (and because they are eeeeeevil).
Sorry. That was a bit more of an off-topic rant. The bigger picture is though, this is my life. This is where perfect plans got me. And I’ve tried to be optimistic about things for so long. Now I can’t see anything in my future but me working a demeaning job that I hate for the rest of my life in some place I’d rather not be while all of my friends and ex-classmates and such go on to do all of these great things with their lives and careers. Everyone’s saying I’ll figure it out, it isn’t the end of the world, all that jazz, but what if this is really what my life is meant to be like? What if I am meant to have all the plans I make fall through, never being able to have enough time or money to do the things that make me happy, not being able to be in a place that I like, working somewhere where the higher-ups talk to me like I’m some uneducated imbecile, having all of the people I enjoy move away and leave me sad and lonely?
Nuvogue
Another challenge from Patrice...
Golden Mile Food Centre
And, while I had my Verve stamps out, I used this month's second Viva la Verve sketch to make this birthday card. I don't need it until next week, but it's nice to have it off my to do list before the weekend!
There were times when we used to land up at a friends’ or reatives’ homes unannounced and never doubt for a minute if you’ll not be welcomed with open arms.
It’s a super relaxed film but I actually think that’s okay. This is, after all, a true case, a murder that actually happened, and I’ve read that some people from Carthage are kind of annoyed at this film, so maybe making it much more of a satire may have been too much. This film, by focussing so much on the perspective of the townspeople more than on that of the people, and by making their jokes out the conviction these people had that Bernie hadn’t committed the crime, makes the whole thing strike a really nice balance tonally. And then there’s Jack Black and that performance; this film is worth watching for that alone.
Anyway, Tara Costa was there. I saw her on TV. The Biggest Loser did not inspire me to lose weight, but Tara did inspire me to compete. She was one fierce competitor on that show I was gonna get her autograph, but I preferred to stay with my teammates. We took a lot of awards. Including the first 2 women!
Keith Hudson – Bloody Eyes Track Listing:
The first sip gives some sharp crystal malts but that come handcuffed to some sharp crystal malts with some caramel. There is a strong alcohol bite that I probably should have expected. Otherwise, it's actually deceptively mild. It doesn't at all fetishize the spicy Belgian aspect of it, which also makes it easily drinkable. It's very smooth for a Belgian tripel, especially one that's 10% abv. The feel is butter and honey, rather than champagne or orange juice pulp.
JAPANESE MILITARY EXPANSION CONTINUES:
The angels are singing.
... Irv Stumler, former New Albany mayoral candidate and Floyd County resident, pointed to the Louisville-based conservancy group River Fields for adding unnecessary bloat to the project.
valuable
Despite all the good that Xavier and his team do, it is very difficult for them as mutants; sometimes even fellow super-humans fear them and are often times at odds with them. However, Xavier’s X-Men continue on, in many ways because it is like Nightcrawler tells Storm in X-Men 2, “When I was in the circus, people were scared of me. But I didn’t hate them. I pitied them, because sometimes people may not be able to see past what they can see with their own two eyes.”
gorgoroth Brutal Assalt Open Air, Czech Republic (10.08.2007)
In thine haste to accept the previous axiom do not be fooled into believing that all scribers will become remembered. There are those who write in languages not spoken by normal beings.
One of the first places to start would be your front door!
Oldspeak: “What fresh hell is THIS? So-called medical doctors administering Metrazol LSD and electroshock ‘treatment’ to children. That government-sponsored experimentation still occurs makes a mockery of any governmental efforts, however valid, to protect people from science run amok – and a nation that uses its young, its children, for such pursuits is a nation whose commitment to human rights and democratic principles should be seriously questioned and challenged.”
Wow! It's humbling and incredibly encouraging to know the Creator of the Universe somehow finds the time to manage even the smallest details of our lives. We are special to Him and He loves composing grace notes in the symphonies of our lives.
Having been brought into the Kingdom by God the expectation is that we now live according to the ethos of grace which characterises the Kingdom. We don’t do this in a vacuum but in the context of what God has done for us. We prove the genuine nature of our dependence on God’s grace by interacting with others as God does. This is something the ungrateful slave totally failed to do. Very quickly the great mercy of the king was forgotten as he exercised his right, as he saw it, to be paid by the unfortunate slave who owed him a little money.
He asked to pay something on his bill because he knew he wouldn't be able to afford it all before Christmas. Then a mysterious woman stepped up to the counter.
Up for grabs this month is a set of Spring Limited Edition Promarkers which I have to say are just lovely. It is a shame that they are Ltd Ed as they are really soft muted shades. I bought myself and the mum in law a set and an extra set for you lovely people.
So anyway, back to intentional living: I want to use my time wisely...as a working mom, a big chunk of time is teaching. I started keeping weekly goals for myself in January (thanks to this great idea), but that fizzled out. I am moving that whiteboard to the kitchen, so I can see it everyday. I hardly watch TV, but will cut out more. Family meetings will be starting soon-I'll share how I decide to do it. I just want to make the most of the time with my family as I can. Sometimes I find us all in different room, me blog surfing or reading, the kids in the playroom or watching TV, and Joe working or listening to a podcast. That's fine-we all need a break sometimes, but I want to make sure it doesn't happen too often.
A trend exists to separate patent and know-how royalty payments in licence agreements. There are several reasons for this:
the financial reform commission and
Of course, the kitten is also a classic CATAPHOR. Throughout The Third Man, we are repeatedly led to believe that Anna Schmidt is helplessly, hopelessly, unequivocally in love with Harry Lime, yet Alida Valli and Orson Welles have no scenes together until near the end, when he walks into the trap laid for him by Martins and Calloway at the Café Marc Aurel, and she cries, "Harry get away! The police are outside! Quick!" Even now they are not sharing the frame, but she shows no hesitation in trying to help him, even when he pulls a gun. All through the film, we have been required to take this love on trust, with no physical contact, nor even dialogue between the two characters. Indeed, for much of the narrative she, like Holly Martins, supposes him dead. How then to convince an audience of her unwavering devotion?
I havent been to the gym in a few weeks, i’ve just been trying to settle into my illustration course and find my routine.
Please join in the C.S.D. Blog Hop Meme that is going on throughout the entire month of February to enter yourselves in another giveaway sponsored by The Paper Trail. I'd love to see you all join in the fun!
I have heard that Toronto Public Library is one of the best library systems on the entire North American continent. Possibly also one of the biggest - there are 99 branches. Even Montreal's public library only has 50 branches. We have to all work together to KEEP it that way.
That's right, THREE HUNDRED AND FIFTY! Darn you Nichole and your fabulous puffy cloud light fixture thingie! After defending your sanity to your concerned spouse, go buy more coffee filters. Fold, glue and burn some more. The outcome is fabulous and so worth it!
Psychology is even used to explain the behavior of the ghosts. In a classroom lecture Mattie listens to the teacher explain the pathological mind that needs to consume the Other, much like the ghosts’ need to consume living human beings.
Sorry, for the lack of updates, my desire to blog has just vanished recently. I have a couple of things to talk abut but nothing earth shatteringly interesting, just about hair.
~NO MAHOU SHOUJO!!! This is, has been, and will stay a rule for the Brigade. This is due to the amount of brain damage the chief can sustain from watching a scene of transformation… 24 times in a season.
I made a huge witch using a template from Martha Stewart that is technically for creating a plywood silhouette for the front yard. I laid out the whole series on 2 widths of contact paper, traced, cut and stick.
You never stop believing in me when I don't know,
We want to celebrate with the world, too. We don't normally like going to New York City Pride. It sucks to get to Manhattan on a weekend. It's hot and crowded. And hey, the Sonoma NASCAR race is on! But this year, we're TiVoing Sonoma. We're going to Pride tomorrow. Anything else is unthinkable. Then we'll get up, pack our gear, and look for the next job to do.
The shadows
Following the announcement yesterday by the European Commission, of the approval of the restructuring plans of Anglo Irish Bank (“Anglo”) and Irish Nationwide Building Society (INBS), the Irish Department of Finance has today announced that INBS’s assets and liabilities will be transferred to Anglo and the new entity is to have a new name. The DoF announcement doesn’t actually mention the new entity’s name but the press reports that it is to be the Irish Banking Resolution Corporation or IBRC. This merged entity has so far cost the Irish taxpayer €34.7bn and may cost more as the €40bn-odd of loans in the merged entity are worked out over the next number of years. IBRC doesn’t hold deposits and will be providing no new lending save in pursuance of existing loan agreements.
9. According to P.K Subban; things would have been much different if he was ‘Spanish’.
That’s only a small part of Elizabeth’s story as a child, one that shaped who she became and how she ruled. Elizabeth: The Struggle for the Throne by David Starkey tells her story largely through her eyes, and those of people close to her. This isn’t the biography that you normally see about Elizabeth, it’s about her childhood, how she became who she was as a Queen, rather than the Queen Elizabeth. For years, and years, the Tudor family held a special place in my heart. There was something so human about them compared to others, their history called to me. I was hooked. In grade 10, I picked up this book for an independent study unit we had to do for English. We had to read a non-fiction book and create something around it, as well as give a presentation. Unlike most people who made a few articles from a pretend newspaper or wrote a little book. I decided to take on a massive project. I wrote a series of articles detailing Elizabeth’s life, except they were from both the Protestant and Catholic points of view. I did two articles for each major event in her life, and ended up with a series of articles consisting of somewhere around 20,000 words (I’ve gotta find them, I don’t know where they went). I was so proud. It was something that I was interested in, something that I wanted to do. Unlike so many other projects in high school. I loved every second of the book, which read more like a novel than a non-fiction book to me. It was a story of a woman who I admired, and I couldn’t help but want to know more. If I hadn’t gone into science, I probably would have chosen history, gone through and done everything that I possibly could on the Tudor family, focusing on Elizabeth and her mother. I think I would have been happy doing that too.
4) List 10 interesting things about yourself
The names of the bowl games is a clear indicator of where the priorities lie. The games used to be called the Rose Bowl, the Orange Bowl, the Fiesta Bowl and the Sugar Bowl. Now, with the advent of the BCS, the games are now called the FedEx Orange Bowl, the Allstate Sugar Bowl, the Tostitos Fiesta Bowl, and the Rose Bowl Game presented by Vizio. These names are stupid. It's the same as the stadium names in professional sports, but at least the athletes are being paid in the Pro's.
You confuse your current with your past
From 1 to 2:30 p.m. on Monday, a group that will include activists and media personnel will listen to local residents’ stories of need at a site on the corner of Independence Boulevard and Willow Street in Mount Airy. A local organizer said this is the same location near BB&T-Blue Ridge Burke Insurance where a “Bring it Beck” rally was held last Labor Day.
I responded to this last one a bit more violently by declaring: "Just for that, I am so going to sleep with the next random guy who walks by!" Which happened to be a 70 year old man, as I was in the pharmacy section of CVS at the time.
I felt more distinguished
If I look to Him for it.
Now there are a few rules that come with the award:
The sun and the leaves and the wind are almost enough to live on today. But I ate breakfast anyway. I believe in eating a good breakfast, even when the world is blowing away.
We gave students a chance to make a commitment to Jesus and to regularly attending our high school ministry called Powerhouse. Then just this week I received a text message and an attached photo that read, "Was going through my wallet and found this."
All photographs taken with my Leica lens/Panasonic LX5.
But yes — this does seem to be another day in my life here in 3D 2012.
I've been really busy for the last few weeks with pretty much every aspect of my life. There's been a lot of work, and stress, and change; and yesterday, in the midst of a move, I decided to take some time to unwind while doing something I love: cooking with beer! What follows is the best recipe I've come up with for Carbonnades Flamandes yet. What makes this one really stand out is that I smoked the meat prior to continuing with the rest of the recipe. It gives it a great red color, and adds a ton of flavor that melds well with the rest of the dish.
Through the comparison, could these two events be in any way related to each other? Of course, it is not possible considering the fact that the Titan was a fiction written 14 years before the actual sinking. No lucid mind would be able to comprehend how one could accurately document Titanic’s destiny even before the tragedy stuck. What did Morgan Robertson offered to us? Just a novel or an early premonition of a disaster he himself could have not known was bound to happen. Morgan was 51 when Titanic hit rock bottom and died 3 years later and 14 years before Titanic was even assembled, he has framed a forewarning of a true-life incident in his book.
All my love.
I dont have anything bad to say about it except Topps quality control! A number of the base cards had dings in the lower left corner. You can see it on the Youkilis above. Weirdly the damaged cards weren't in sequence. I would get one from one pack and maybe three in another. Still at least none were creased or scratched up.
Well folks, hows she cuttin' as they say in my neck of the woods? I'm sure it originally comes from some sort of farming term...but in plain good ole English, that basically means "How are you"?
The young pass by, and smile, and say
Appearing again before her sons, she accompanied them to the Dingle of the Physicians (Pant y Meddygon) and showed them the individual herbs and told them their medical properties and what illnessess they could treat. They became very skilled in their profession, and undertook to write down all they had learned, so that others could also learn and benefit from their knowledge.
And visually, she was spot-on... especially at The Reaping, where she somehow combined clueless and menacing, which is perfect for where she's at in the first book.
Additional traffic signals will be installed as well on Michigan Avenue.
Promote resentment toward a race or class of people.
1133 **D-IV/1/1992. “In the Service of the Best Legal Education in the United States.” Prelude, Law School Great Books Program Lecture, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(2), above, pp. 724-26.) See Item C-1997(9), above, pp. 136-38.
The new year has brought me more organization with our homeschool. It feels better then before. Lessons learned from the first 1/2 of our year I suppose. In the past couple of weeks....
The Glenrothes is a huge distillery, one of five in the small town of Rothes. Only about two-percent of its output is released as singles, the rest goes into blends.
Up Next: Powered Peril out at the end of August
Okay Contest time to win a copy of my Book please comment on what was the most unexpected dating advice you have ever been given. Winners will be choosen on Monday August 8th. For all the Blog Tour Rules check out the main Blog.
work, talking in foreign tongues. Broom and water
that he may exalt you in due time.
21. Graduate college: I actually graduated December 2010 but since O'More didn't have a winter grad ceremony I walked in the Spring and got my diploma on my mom's birthday!
DICK TRACY (John Caglione Jr., Doug Drexler)
I can honestly admit I’m a very technologically oriented person, and that with that I am also very avid about it’s uses and production. Maybe because I’ve grown up with technology all my life, or maybe because in technology I find stability and dependability. When I look at technology it is something that is tangible, pure science, the cold hard truth and the outcome of mathematics, physics, and engineering put to action. With technology as long as you continually maintain it properly it will not disappoint, but recently technology is advancing so much and it’s taken one of my favorite hobbies being a grease monkey (person who loves to work on cars in a sense) and it’s slowly turning it from something I love to do on my free time to something I’ve got to research and prepare myself for.
And when I stepped up to that urinal,
During these same chase scenes, the person attempting to ward of the Terminator (Kyle in The Terminator, Sarah in Terminator 2) is injured by a gunshot.
He just shot him a sideways glance, “We’re not even dating.”
I had the pleasure of meeting her several years ago, and...hold onto your shorts with this one...was in an infomercial she did. That's right - I'm a late night celebrity. About 5 years ago, had you awoken in the night and been bored to tears because you couldn't fall back to sleep, I'm guessing you caught a glimpse of me talking about how amazing Marilu is and what a health genius she is. Yup, I said genius. And I still think so highly of her that if you wake up tonight in the middle of the night, I'd tell you just to call me and I'd go on and on about how awesome she is.
who raised a family of thirteen children.
Bake for 35-40 minutes, until brownies and cheesecake are set. A knife inserted into the cheesecake mixture should come out clean and the edges will be lightly browned.
3. Israel will no longer worship idols
Do you think Obama chose Chicago – or this home – lightly?
Reading has a huge impact and driving force for my life, I have personally experienced to take massive action after a good read. It creates the mental muscles like working out your body in the Gym. He questions when is the last time we pushed our self? Good question!!! if you haven’t really pushed your self and taken a massive change in life!!! This is time to make it..
The only slight downside to CC is the price point and the lead time. The prices are not out of line though, because they reflect the premium materials and expert craftsmanship that make each piece so special. In the long run, the higher level of quality and durability will offset the initial cost. Also, the long production/delivery schedule (2-3 months) is very typical for custom, handmade rugs. So if you have the budget and a bit of patience, definitely consider using Custom Cool. To me, they are a much needed alternative to Madeleine Weinrib and I'm excited to have them as a resource!
I wanted to follow up yesterday's post with another quick update. After consulting with the surgeon about the J tube (feeding tube surgically attached to the lower intestine) we decided that I wasn't ready for this procedure yet. We really got the impression from the surgeon that I wasn't at that nutritionally needy place yet and of course we didn't have to make decisions right away anyway. The doctors all called this a minor surgical procedure, but it would still mean a 3-5 day stint in the hospital just for the surgery with a 6-8 time period of recovery and lifting limitations. To me with no prior surgical experience anything seems major, plus fitting this type of surgery in between chemo treatments would be really tough and a delicate situation. The procedure only addresses nutrition and has nothing to do with any future nausea and pain that is caused by my chemo and/or cancer so imagine heaving while trying to heal, plus skipping treatments for that long would be really tough and allow the cancer to spread. Can you say caught between a rock and a hard place?
I use this all the time as a precursor to the introduction of my opinion in any discussion (see above).
C. Rule out Autism Spectrum Disorder (ASD). Autism Spectrum Disorder by definition encompasses pragmatic communication problems, but also includes restricted, repetitive patterns of behavior, interests or activities as part of the autism spectrum. Therefore, ASD needs to be ruled out for SCD to be diagnosed.
In our schools, two generations of our children have been taught lies by politically motivated liars, whilst our media, our politicians and agenda driven historians present us with a entirely fictionalised version of our history. Yet, the myths behind white guilt, certainly as they apply to Great Britain, do not stand up against even the most cursory of of analysis, in terms of our Imperial past we have very little to feel guilty about.
Cordless Reciprocating Saw Shop Includes 20V Cordless Lithium-Ion 10-in Chain Saw (Tool Only) – 20602, Tool Only – Batteries and Charger Sold Separately, Owner’s Manual, Brand GreenworksEasy adjust chain tension4 Year Parts & Labor Warranty10-inch bar and chain2.6 Ah or 6.0 Ah Battery (Not Included)20 Volt Lithium Ion Chain Saw
by Nick Andrea
Being hurt or whatever doesn’t change our true spirit. This quote struck a chord with me because in this time of my life trying to ‘prove’ this weird disability sometimes I feel as though I do not belong in the well or disabled world.
Having read her memoir Being and Becoming, I always wanted to write a biography about Myrna Loy, because she and Clark were such good friends and because I have always enjoyed her acting work, but I was never in the right place to do it and then Emily Leider got there ahead of me last year. You have to accept that as a writer you are either in the right place (mentally and physically) to do a particular book or you are not, and you can’t force it. Sometimes you have to know when to move on. Jean Harlow was another actor who always fascinated me and who also had a long-standing connection to Gable. Eve Golden’s wonderful Platinum Girl remains the best biography about her and was a model to me as well. As far as directors are concerned, my hat is off to Preston Sturges, who was really the first successful Hollywood screenwriter to direct his own scripts, and his absorbing and influential Sullivan’s Travels, followed by Victor Fleming, Ridley Scott, and Orson Welles.
His professional career began in 1943 as a curtain puller at the Cleveland Play House. He hosted a radio sports show on “Teen Time” on WJW radio from 1946-1948. He began his television career in 1947 as a page boy for WEWS, Ohio’s first TV station, and became a cameraman in 1948 as well as a film editor and news photographer.
What is so wonderful is that I know most of you are NOT Bystanders. That is why I thank you; for sharing our story, for praying for us, and for helping. For praying about children who are orphans and without families and care. For contributing to our causes, and encouraging others to as well. For thinking of us, for our little boy, and for the millions of little boys who need families.
The holiday season is well under way here, and most of the restaurants that closed during winter have re opened. We are taking on the task of checking out some of our old favourites as well as finding some new ones to recommend to clients.
3) Favorite pet (or animal/creature):
In kEraLa, some people pronounce butter as vutter.
I ain't missing you at all.
And, as always (but especially now), the photo doesn't do it justice. My back up camera just can't seem to focus properly, no matter what setting I'm using, so everything looks soft-focus. That wasn't my intent, darn it!
Cardstock: Soft Suede & Wild Wasabi textured cardstock, Pool Party, Very Vanilla,
This post is sort of a continuation to my previous post, which was about our July 4th celebration. As mentioned to you, my hubby and I decided to grill some rib-eyes, and I prepared this side salad.
You can catch it like the flu.
Have you swum with a friendly dolphin
Ashes to ashes, dust to dust.
"The overall impression of registrant's mark is soft, curved and rounded, and the overall impression of applicant's flourish is severe, angular and linear. Based on the total effect of the respective marks, rather than their individual features, we find that the difference in the marks are sufficient to distinguish them."
The Dead C, PatienceIt takes a little patience on this LP (pun-intended), but the New Zealand noise rock legends still got it.
Dear Ruby, Shaun and Summer,
Accessories: striped grosgrain ribbon, pearls
in Germany - Friday @ Midnight
SHIFT: 4:00 pm to 10 pm
Every aboriginal Nunheader I have met has a story of getting up to no good in the unprotected mausoleums and in the dense brush and forests above the graves in the Cemetery. It must have been truly beautiful. It was almost completely beautiful when I moved to Nunhead ten years ago.
Fat Boys Wipe out US
Servings: 18 (2 cookies per serving -- 1 cookie just isn't fair!)
The Reestablishment said their way was the only way to fix things, so they threw Juliette in a cell. Now so many people are dead that the survivors are whispering war- and The Reestablishment has changed its mind. Maybe Juliette is more than a tortured soul stuffed into a poisonous body. Maybe she's exactly what they need right now.
6/10: I'm not a fan of MMORPGs like this. It's why I never played WoW. There's too much to do and way too much grinding of enemies in order to buy better weapons and armor in order to beat the next quest. Chances are if you liked WoW, you might like this game. If you didn't like WoW, I wouldn't bother. I got bored of it after a couple hours of killing the same couple enemies over and over. If the game were a bit more focused on the shooter aspect of the game, I might be a bit more interested.
I treasure the Italian apartment we called home for six weeks of our fourteen week, four-continent trip. But I don't long to be back there, in the way I have pined in times past for some surf-side beach chair. What Christ accomplished there, I am experiencing here, now, today--beside the fire in my home. And I benefitted from it earlier today as I encouraged a parishioner who is grieving, and yesterday in a nursing facility while ministering to a friend who has had yet another stroke.
The industry standard measurement is ‘unique users’ – simply put, the number of different people who have accessed a website at least once in a month. It’s the only figure which the newspaper circulation body, Audit Bureau of Circulation, compiles.
"Same," is all she says. It was a match. Misfits, yet bound by a feeling of isolation and unbelonging. How they both wanted to belong, and soon.
2. Reminisce about past romances. There is nothing more romantic then talking about everyone else you have slept with while cuddling after great sex. You can make this discussion even hotter by comparing your partner to those past romances.
This verse absolutely fascinated me. It was the part about saying “I love you”… RIGHT OUT LOUD that really got me. What was that like? Saying I Love You must be the most amazing thing in the whole world! Just like the song says…
Don’t forget to breathe. When I’m angry, I hate hearing that one. But it really does work. Taking one second to breathe deeply or counting to five shifts the brain from ‘fight or flight’, to ‘focus’ (thinking of more rational responses). Remind yourself to breathe, focus attention, and to carefully think through what your reaction to stress/conflict will be.
Dear Victoria Strauss,
I've learned that in order for a good salsa to gain that depth of flavor, the ingredients(some or all) need to be roasted or grilled. When using raw ingredients, the flavor can be a bit more harsh. Granted I still love a fresh salsa... especially during the summer months when tomatoes and peppers are at their peak. But it's good to have a back-up for the fresh salsa....
So, what is a Vegan? A Vegan is a person whom for various reasons has chosen a vegetarian diet but, avoids the use of milk, dairy, eggs and/or any other food, clothing, etc. with animal products. Even including things like refined white sugar and wines!
The suspect, David Foster, was indicted on one count of possession with intent to distribute the drug. Foster filed a motion to suppress the drugs as evidence in his trial, claiming officers lacked "reasonable suspicion" to make the stop. The district court denied the motion. The appeals court reversed that denial.
I wanted to make smaller gable boxes to give away as RAKs to some friends and because it was going to be at Teri's dad's 91st birthday, I thought why not use my Sweet Treats cricut cartridge and cut out some sunflowers. So that's what I did. I added some candies and goodies inside. I created a couple more that are going to good homes.
2. Aaron Murray (10/22, 45% comp., 96yds, 1 INT) - I felt like Murray was trying too hard today. It is clear that his arm is very good, he can put plenty of zip on his throws and he can scramble too. But Murray struggled badly with his downfield accuracy today. He overthrew a wide open AJ Green at least 3 times, by 6 feet or more on all occasions. Most of the day he seemed to do fairly well under pressure, but in one instance, with a defender in his face, he tried to force a throw that ended up in the chest of a waiting linebacker, without an offensive receiver anywhere in the area. David Hale appropriately compared it to a Joe Cox INT. Murray will have the chance to win the starting job before the SEC opener, but he wasn’t the best on Saturday afternoon.
Above Haydon Bridge looking west
The Belmont Station Beer Forum reports that there will be a Fresh Hop Beer "Tastival" next month at the NW Lucky Labrador in October. Its a fitting harvest festival for a pleasantly bitter summer. I can't believe I spent the last one drinking gin and tonic. (I'd ask to have it refunded, but you should never ask back for the gin that's drank.)
Jacob Mchangama, a lecturer in international human rights at the University of Copenhagen, wrote that "respect for freedom of expression is the hallmark of free societies and the first right to be circumscribed by illiberal states". Eleanor Roosevelt, that great democrat who drafted the UN Declaration of Human Rights, might have agreed with him. Roosevelt warned humanity about the suppression of freedom under the guise of protecting citizens against hostile speech. She was concerned in particular with Article 20 of the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, which has been used successfully to lobby for anti-vilification laws in Australia and other Western countries.
Before that it was abuse against women.
Factor B black brown
Oh, and totally don't go for the online price - go to the store and get them for the steal of $14 less than online. $10.97 people! But the .97 does mean that it is final sale and not available for refund/return, so be sure. Be very VERY sure.
Cooking the rack was super easy. You could follow any rack of lamb recipe, but I found I underestimated on oven time. First I cut the rack in two, then sealed both pieces on all sides with some butter and oil in a pan. Then I popped them both into a hot oven (220C) for 17 minutes. Because the layer of fat on the rack was so thick, the mutton turned out very rare, so when it came to carving the rack I popped each cutlet into the pan for a few seconds each side.
Just recently I was in the market for a night light. Since my son is a teenager now, I thought I was beyond shopping for those little darkness busters, but I’m now in that in between spot that many people are finding themselves in. That time when you are in between taking care of your children and your parents.
If Ms Newton is indeed a Travel Assistant, then what does Lisa Ghany-Weeke’s do?
AdriN2001: Dude Mare
The kids are off of school today, it's Teacher Work Day
But fair enough – the US became the most powerful Nation State on the planet, and a successful federation. Lets look at why.
And yet, here is a case where I can mostly forgive the didacticism, since the philosophical and moral issues it raises are so fascinating to ponder. Both having escaped from a maximum-security prison in Alaska, Manny (Voight) and Buck (Roberts) find themselves trapped on a train barreling uncontrollably forth after its conductor suffers a heart attack just as it's about to leave a station; the train becomes the setting for what amounts to moral tug-of-war between a weary older prisoner-legend (Manny) and the dim-bulb younger prisoner who idolizes him (Buck). Buck only knows of a life of crime; a criminal is all he aspires to be. Manny, however, has spent years in the slammer, and it seems all those years have instilled in him a sense of regret at choices not made in his own life. Both of them may technically be "free," but mentally speaking, are they really? Does Buck truly understand the implications of his freedom, or is he actually still stuck in a prison of his own imagining, reinforced by years of being treated like less than a human being by prison authorities? And while Manny seems to have a better grasp of what his freedom means, he is perhaps also locked into his own criminal past, unable to, well, run away from it—especially with the prison's vengeful warden (John P. Ryan) ruthlessly hounding him even after he has escaped from his clutches.
Lately, the RK Motors name has appeared on all forms of media and even a few race cars. From Quarter Midgets to NASCAR, RK Motors Charlotte proudly supports all types of racing. RK Motors owner, Rob Kauffman, even drives a RKM-sponsored Ferrari F458 Italia in endurance races like the Rolex 24 and 12 Hours of Sebring.
Depressed suddenly, I decided to read through all the emails I’d received. Out of the 11, 3 looked promising. Their pictures were alright and the emails funny. So, I replied to all 3 and now I have 2 dates set for this weekend. Which isn’t bad I guess (?)
For us in this world.
Much quicker!
My husband had read all 3 books in the series, so of course as soon as The Hunger Games film came out we just had to go watch it. I know deep down that I wanted to have read the book first, but the way my schedule has been running since January, who knows when I would have been able to accomplish that.
Since 1973, after a rough transition period in the mid-Seventies, the all volunteer military has proven highly successful, producing a professional, motivated force, with the military normally being able to meet recruitment goals while maintaining high standards for the volunteers accepted. The days when the military would accept virtually any warm body, no questions asked, are long gone. I encounter, on a fairly regular basis, parents distressed because their children have attempted to enlist and been turned down for one reason or another. The return to a volunteer military is a return to the way the nation has defended itself except in times of national crisis on the scale of a world war or a civil war.
3. I like to challenge myself since I’m bored out of my skull most days hanging around the house.
The sad part is that for me, sleep really is like a daily vitamin. My body feels good, I'm in a good mood, all is right with the world. Don't get me wrong, I am trying to get sleep. I even do my best to be in bed by 9:30/9:45 PM. So things start off good. Then, Amos will need to go out and he will bypass anyone else in the house to get me. So many nights, I am startled out of a sound sleep by Amos whining. I get back to sleep, only to wake up practically hanging off the bed because Zoe has climbed in our bed and has taken over all the extra space. I've tried it all. We put her back in her bed and she just comes back. I've tried just scooting down to the bottom of the bed and she makes her way down to the bottom of the bed too. I've tried sleeping in the guest bed and if she wakes up and I'm not there, she goes to find me and climbs into bed. That's if Amos doesn't get there first. He also stalks me at night. If I get up to go to the bathroom, he's usually right behind me. (Making sure I don't make a run for it?)
“Bitter World, this is Steve”
and the glaze has come out nice and rich.
Hobby hexipuffs.
1/3 c. carrot
Weakness: As good as the Gators are at shooting the three, they’re equally as bad as defending it. Florida allows its opponents to shoot close to 36 percent from behind the arc. That’s not good enough in the tournament. Three-point shooting is too important for them to not defend better. They could be out of this tournament quickly if they don’t defend the three better.
Charlie – Florida
I was intending to write today of some scandalous news I have recieved from a contact in the United Kingdom. It concerns a well known anarchist leader from Badfort and his relationship with a young lady student whilst he was engaged in 'teaching' political studies at St.Andrews University (in Scotland) during 2001.
both em and en dashes benefit from using thin or hair spaces on both sides. adjust depending on the natural space around the letter or numbers on either side. (such as a 1 vs a 0). White spaces are in the type menu, at the bottom, below insert special character.
Whew. If anything, I think Cata taught me more patience with myself and that I don’t always have to be “the best” to have fun. And for good old, competitive “I have to be valedictorian or I suck” me, that’s probably a GOOD lesson.
You can get as creative as you want with this! I'm using this as a travel tool, but these are also great ideas for toddler egg hunts if you don't want them to have too many sweets (a few are okay, though, it's a holiday!) Leave out the chocolate if you're hiding eggs outside.
Gregory: Poor Ricky
Oil and spray paint on Canvas 2009
been there …. (I am there) so I can relate.
Let’s start off with the sushi platter! It includes Salmon Rolls, Soft Shell Crabs in Egg Roll and yummy Mochi.
The event will be hosted by the lovely Muneera from Poetic Pilgrimage, and ex-MTV host Kristiane Backer and features catwalk shows, a 3 course Afghan meal (YUM!) as well as an opportunity to mingle and network with other girls and women, and do what we do best, chit chat!!! So there is no excuse not to attend (unless you live on the other side of the world and then you can be excused!), dress up, get your heels on, have a great night whilst making a difference.
I added a piece of embossed card to the base, embossed with the Tim Holtz Spring Alterations folder and swiped with yellow ink. I added a border made from more of the pink stamped paper and the Martha Stewart floral double edge punch. The card itself was made from green parchment card.
I command all ye rattens that be here about,
Yesterday my day at work started with a visit to the phlebotomist. I plan to do the tasks I need to do to get a wellness discount on my insurance. Before the needle stick, I fasted for 12 hours.
What happens when resources become scarce and society starts to crumble? As the competition for resources pulls America's previously stable society apart, the "New Normal" is a Soft Apocalypse. This is how our world ends; with a whimper instead of a bang.
WHEN: Ongoing
Anywho, Syp emailed me and asked if I might chip in on this NBI thing. I’m far from a mainstream blogger, and I just kind of do my own thing here, so I’m pretty sure I won’t be the most relevant voice in the auditorium. Still, sitting apart from the chorus as I do, maybe that’s exactly the voice that someone needs to hear. If my writing here can be useful and uplifting somewhere, hey, why not take part?
I hate poker because I love it soooo much! It's addicting, I'm not bad at it, I've sat and played for 8 hours straight many times, I dream of being a pro.
running up and down those stairs
And I shared a few thoughts via Twitter, where I learned that a "Social Media Power Moms of Color" list was coming soon. But that didn't satisfy me or others, apparently. It was seen as too little, too late. I'm not sure if the new list ever came out. Regardless, I made my own version.
When I wasn't stuffing my face or cleaning, I was pouring every spare second I had into tweaking my sister's new blog! Please join me in welcoming her to the blogging world, head over to My Uneventful Life and check out her very first post! Be sure to follow her and show her some love. She's the best big sister I have so I had to spread the news!
-I pray He isn't done.
In Renly’s camp, Littlefinger is up to his usual tricks, trying to act innocent in order to build himself an insurance policy, should the Lannister’s fall. His scene with Catelyn was stunning, and seeing the way that the sight of Cat going from fierce and angry to almost broken with grief was really emotional. I can’t believe that so many GoT fans were outraged by Michelle Fairley being cast as Cat. She stole the show this week, and the music in this scene was incredible. We then see what passes for negotiations between Renly and Stannis, and it really hammers home just how different these two brothers are. I found myself unable to root for either one of them, as they both have their flaws. I reckon GRRM will surprise everyone and put Gendry on the Iron Throne, when all’s done.
Well, we’re having a little scare tonight. Miss. Abby discovered some hotel chocolates (in an old purse that had somehow made it on the floor) and decided to turn them into her bedtime snack. I called the ASPCA Poison Control center, who told me to expect vomiting and an upset tummy, so I’m making this short.
5 porter
Grandma taught Paige a few crochet tips and Paige (in return) taught Grandma how to finger knit! My Mom is a skilled knitter and crocheter and can make just about anything anywhere out of thin air ~ oh, that talented Mom of mine...
Favorite superhero: Hulk.
Peter or Simon Peter was often considered to be Jesus’ successor, yet Judas was special as well. Although Judas betrayed Jesus, he seemed to being doing so under Jesus’ command. Judas understood things that the others did not.
Although Idaho lawmakers approved the state’s first felony animal cruelty law earlier this year, Hemingway says she doesn’t believe the law goes far enough, and that no one will ever be convicted under it.
- Sound oral and written communication skills
Lord, make me a channel of your peace today – where there’s despair in life, let me bring hope; where there is darkness, only light; where there’s sadness, only joy; where there’s alienation, only community; where there’s desolation; only renewal; where there’s a prison; only liberation; where there’s fear; only trust and faith; where there’s brokenness; only healing and restoration; where there’s insecurity; only unconditional love. Amen. – The first three are from St. Francis and then I added some others.
Otherwise, the chronicles of my teaching and design experience will be in: www.blackmaildesign.blogspot.com
Hartikainen AL, Sorri MS, Anttonen H, Tuimala R, Laara E. Effect of occupational noise on the course and outcome of pregnancy. Scand J Work Environ Health 1994; 6: 444-450.
Sending more forces was only part of the plan. The president directed a public campaign to broadcast the success of that strategy, sending a clear message to America’s enemies.
Pours a blackish brown, with a dark tan head. Roasted grain smell, but with the edge taken off of it.
Life in the Australian bush was remote and difficult. The population was low and spread thinly over vast distances. The difficulties of obtaining materials, storing and preserving food and facing the daily challenges and dangers of life created the "Australian Character". This was a classic book of that era. Check out some of the recipes
wise cause viruses or infections. Next time you or
Slide guitar and thumping drums are the feature of ‘On The Run,’ before, at over six minutes, ‘Sunday Night Blues’ develops into a bit of a Blues (no kidding?) epic, complete with Hammond organ and rock guitar solos. ‘No Love Lost’ has a bit of a dark riff again, but ‘Human Politics’ seems a bit lighter with piano laying over a metronomic beat and vocals at points echoing Lou Reed in place.
So yes that’s it, we have in fact come to the end of the eye drawing exercise, it’s been good.
Well, it actually worked quite nicely and within a few moments Oliver was reaching out for the bit, so for now my rides will work on training my hands like this for a portion. So then we tried it without the whip, and it was much improved. Christy noted that I actually seem to learn things better at the trot, as the more forward motion stops Oliver from stalling out.
They informed me that INAC already has a process in place to deal with those who already applied. They advised me NOT to reapply as this might delay the processing of my application. They further advised that INAC would contact me about what the next steps are for my application to be considered.
The shaped bookmark and tail tag have been cut with my KNK Maxx from a Penny Duncan Shaplies file. DP backing is SU and the little verse has been computer generated.
Ultimately, the bad things that happen to us by random chance belong to the texture of life. They aren’t a sign that you have been singled out or cursed. They don’t indicate that you have sinned or that God hates you. The fact that we react so drastically to accidents reveals something deeper, that the texture of normal life is a thin layer of security, beneath which deeper waters stir. We will discuss those deeper waters in the next post.
Kumarakom
The first time I married, I got everything I wanted: a wedding at The Hotel Bel Air, where the swans moved on cue to strains of Bach from the string quartet; bridal showers and bridesmaid luncheons; a walk down the aisle in a fine white gown in front of 150 friends and family. The photo album that followed was envious. Like so many young women who see that bridal gown in the store window, I wanted the fairy tale wedding more than anything, and as if rewarded for that longing, that is exactly what I got. The marriage lasted two years.
One of the more surprising moves, though, might be iLounge’s contention that Apple will launch the iPhone 5 with a new Dock connector featuring fewer pins than the 30-pin option found across its mobile devices today. The new connector is “closer to a pill shape” and will find its way to all future mobile devices the company launches, according to iLounge.
A fly was flying near my cornbread and I killed it but if fell in the middle of the cornbread pan, fortunately it fell in an open area without touching the cornbread, and so I turned the pan upside down to get the dead fly out.
are the scent of night
overload pictures comin' right at you!
Janie is a Seeker, she has been trained to rid the streets of the undead and of super creepy vampire-demon halfbreeds called Daychildren. One night out Seeking, she is completely unprepared for what she would have to fight, until Kai comes along, saves her and finishes them off.
Final result: Clifford Starks defeats Dustin Jacoby via unanimous decision (30-27 x3)
1 ill
And of course, even knowing all this, they still want the toy in the dispenser at the front of the restaurant.
The charm she radiates is ever intensifying.
Also a playwright and a screenwriter, Brent has several scripts under option and in the process of studio or network development, including a film version of his novel, Geography Club.
But first up were her opening acts.* Sara definitely made us wait! But I didn't mind too much because both performers were fantastic.
Hayes K, Danks DM, Gibas H, Jack I. Cytomegalovirus in human milk. N Engl J Med 1972; 287: 177-178.
broc-
But they are all part of us, shaping perspective, and faith
The Brandling family (after whom the park was named) played a leading role in Newcastle life for 450 years. They acted as mayors, businessmen, M.P’s, landowners and mine owners. It was the disastrous explosion at the Brandling’s Felling Colliery in 1812 that led to the invention of the miner’s safety lamp. Most of the family were fine, upstanding citizens, while some were sharp businessmen or worse – one 16th century Brandling was excommunicated charged with adultery, assault and other offences, fined £ 3,000 plus costs and sentenced to prison. Somehow he never had to pay the fine and neither did he go to prison. The family knew how to survive and prosper.
The " Welcome Friends" sign was considered Easter Clearance and I paid a whopping $1.29 for it!! It was originally $12.99.........
Since the idea of a community is crucial element of the docu learning contract and the documentary itself I figured it is about time to spend some brain power and research on this issue. If I type ‘community’ into the search bar for Google images I get the following compilation of impressions:
2 (8 oz.) blocks of cream cheese, softened
Disclaimer: This post is about poop! You might not want to read it, but I have had alot of questions about Gracie's sn....and her sn happens to be poop! :)
2002 was too soon to do anything too celebratory. It seemed disrespectful. Like dancing on someone's grave.
Streaming unfettered to the horizon of sight
A beer like this makes me wonder whether complex malt and hop bills are all that important. If I was served this beer without knowing anything about it, there is no way I would guess it was produced from only a single variety of hops and malt. There is plenty of flavor, character, and depth here. I certainly wouldn't guess that for a pale ale, it was lacking a light caramel malt addition. Maybe a good practice when constructing and re-brewing a recipe is to start simple and add things as necessary, instead of starting with complexity and taking away to simplify.
In the coming weeks I'll be posting some of the projects that have helped make the Schmoopy Brewery what it is today, including my 5 gallon All-Grain setup and 7cuft Chest Freezer Keggerator and Lagering unit. I'll also throw in the few original recipes I've come up with so far and some of my favorites from other sources.
Problem: Hard to be sympathetic towards the characters
I think that is what I must do, otherwise I'll be forever lost in the past.
Great people tend to gravitate towards great people and thus no wonder that an icon in flood rehabilitation (Khun Preeda) knows an unsung icon of flood prevention (Khun Kent) who has committed his time and knowledge to build an effective flood warning system during the flood crisis.
I sought to understand how dogs were cornered to be killed and invited a guest over who told me that, the ‘convicted’ dog would be called by someone it trusted(or knew his/her voice) and when it would run to answer, an ‘expert’ would deftly give it a fatal machete cut on the neck and that would be the beginning of the end for the dog.
She shares her recipe for her Blueberry Pound Cake. What I love is the
It would be mine. And so it was. Mine.
Beyond the merch: tickets
We are having a Design Team Call which will run for 2 weeks, closing at 9pm on Monday 20th June. We are looking for several new DT members so if you would like to apply, please leave a link on Mr. Linky with a link to one of your favourite pieces of work.
I say...I'm not there but my goal is to get there!
I LOVE this stuff, also have a jelly roll of it in my stash. I HAVE TO LEAVE this home next week or I will once again end up with a dozen things going at once. I am thinking this would make a nice Father's Day quilt for hubby as well as look pretty cute in the family room! Any reason to make another quilt works for me.
1. David Bowie or Jim Bowie- The rules are simple. You’re given a scenario, and you must argue who would be better by your side. David Bowie, the alien rock god. Or Jim Bowie, the wild frontiersman famous for the “Bowie knife”. The drunker you become, the more heated the debate. Warning- This can, and has, ruined relationships. There’s nothing like drunkenly crashing your bicyle into a mailbox, because you were too busy crying to see it. Then trying to explain to the police officer, it was all because your girlfriend said that David Bowie wouldn’t have lost the Alamo.
holding strongly to that intention
PEACE TO ALL
When a person has to employ such drastic measures for waste elimination, or when a person has to pay per the bag for trash elimination, and is personally responsible for hauling the trash away or eliminating it, a person takes greater notice of the waste that is created. At least, my partner and I have. We have stopped disposing of food waste in our garbage under the kitchen sink and have made use of a backyard compost pile. We recycle everything from cat food cans to salad-dressing bottles. We hand-cut our clippings into mulch. If we don’t separate the recyclables from the non-recyclables, we have to pay more at the dump. If we don’t make use of biodegradable resources, they become bio-intensive waste products. We are vigilant.
But of course, what with Matilda being a shoo-in for big success (what with that youth / boxing / kangaroo market out there as-yet untapped), we had product tie-ins aplenty. Tennis balls, plastic model vans, and thanks to no less a restaurant than McDonald's, we get to see Matilda stop at Mickey D's for a couple of cheeseburgers. Nice. In fact, this movie was the one for which McDonald's first developed their Happy Meals.
Weather Report went through many a player in its 16-year history, from 1970-86, with Zawinul on keyboards and Shorter on sax being the mainstays as their main composers. Along the way, there were names like Miroslav Vitous, Chester Thompson, Alphonso Johnson, Jaco Pastorius, Peter Erskine, Victor Bailey, Omar Hakim … a long and glorious list.
tomorrow- the world.
Using miles-per-hour on the treadmill isn’t perfect. The machine is only adjustable to one decimal point, so an 8:31 mile and an 8:35 mile are both done on the 7.0 mile-per-hour setting. However, it’s also difficult to hit exactly the right pace on a track, so I think the treadmill mph settings are close enough!
In the room temperature, the filling will start to soften in no time
thing."
1 assume
His eyes sparkled with mischief as a recounted being a toddler riding on his mothers shoulders and using her pigtails to “steer” her in the direction he wanted to go in the event she wasn’t listening to him.
My sacred one, my mother.
Fisk uses the shop as a post office, according to Michael. “He has his mail sent here when he’s away reporting.”
‘The 66 House Republicans who voted “no” last Aug. 1 to the Budget Control Act, seem to have more of a lock on Speaker John Boehner (R-Ohio) than the 174 who said “yes.” And to keep these conservatives in the fold, the speaker has walked away from the August agreements on appropriations targets for the coming fiscal year’.
I love ranch dressing, I’m from the south yal, born and bred! It’s definitely one of those things that when I’m in the grocery store I stare at all the store-bought thick and creamy ranch dressings and my mouth waters a bit thinking about all the things i could dip in there, but I’ve been really good lately and been making this one instead! It’s not exactly the same as the mayo ridden heavy cream ones, but actually I think it’s better because it’s actually good for you, so zero guilt factor, SCORE! The creaminess comes from the tofu and the soaked cashews. So you’re getting a nice serving of protein with your veggies! It’s not my recipe, but it’s worth showing you guys the link! http://www.theppk.com/2011/05/sanctuary-dip/
Mya’s design incorporates the many different types of people who help the Foundation “Make Strides and Deliver Hope,” and will be featured on all of the 2012 Promise Walk shirts.
The kitty photo on the left shows our cat, Dude, having his way with Anberly's hair. He is absolutely fascinated by her hair and licks/bites at it sometimes. We don't really know why, but I'm glad I was able to capture it in a photo. He's definitely a one-of-a-kind cat.
His summary makes compelling reading, in a number of ways.
She is putting all her weight on it but very short steps and when she turns she has a hard time.
But the idea of a stroboscopic light-bay opening up in the base of an aircraft and illuminating scenes of human prehistory from above is breathtaking—as if dropping illuminative ordnance into a world of darkness, far below. Indeed, as a photographic technique, pinpoint-flashes of high-powered aerial lighting would also be something well worth exploring in other archaeo-architectural contexts, from Angkor Wat to the Spiro Mounds. Light-bomb archaeology.
The low net winning team and teams who fundraise $10,000 or more from each of the 30 events will move on to a final two-day Grand Finale extravaganza at Caesar’s Palace in Las Vegas in late October. The Els Gallery Club is being introduced this year for individuals who wish to participate in the Golf Challenge without playing golf in a Super Regional event. These individuals can compete in teams of one or two to raise funds and awareness for Els for Autism and earn a chance to come to Las Vegas and participate in the Finale.
So there you have it. Judge me as you will. None of this was my idea, but I cannot say that parts of it were not enjoyable. And if Kim Kardashian's fragrance is indeed a "True Reflection" of the smell of her hair, then count me in. The world needs more beauty.
colors speaking, closing in around me.
...easy peasy pie! It sounds far more complicated than it is...the whole thing took about 6 minutes to make...the rest of the time is just baking in the oven :)
Help to rid our land of crime;
The old women have reduced You to mere symbolism
2. Sing with coordination (harp)
Had I heard dueling banjoes at that moment I would have shit a texas sized load in my pants and looked for the guy with the brown teeth hollering
Contacting Garden Centres with information about the group
This blustery day
The Siren tells you this not because she wants to call up a flash mob of old-movie fans to launch a cyberattack on his Mother Jones blog until Mr. Drum agrees to sit through a James Cagney retrospective. She wouldn't even have read his post, had it not been pointed out to her in a puckish message from a gentleman known to commenters here as Gmoke. Well, the Siren has seen people put down old movies for all kinds of reasons and as such posts go, this one is reasonably polite. It’s expressed mostly in terms of puzzlement, and not a petulant desire to have us intellectually validate the writer’s reluctance to get acquainted with the films of Leo McCarey.
So yeah, as you can tell I'm really behind on blogging.
like your disciples, metaphorically sleeping while you’re praying with such
Go to Liz's blog to read the other responses to her prompts. They'll probably be spookier/happier/better than my effort!
There was no immediate comment from Oakland County Clerk Bill Bullard Jr., who was named as a defendant in the suit. The Oakland County Prosecutor’s Office, which also was named as a defendant, said it is investigating the situation.
“Men. That’s what you will become this year. Each one of you will pit yourself against the wild of the Forest. Those of you that survive will come back men, and be assigned a post based of how well you did.”
"Hey, it can't be that bad," Kyle the coffee guy said.
G E Shipping Sells Its Single Hull Aframax Crude Carrier 19
Drawing with Iona. Explaining to her that everything is perfect. That every person is completely whole and divine. That nothing needs to change.
(Information taken from The Daily Mail, 05/04/2012)
It seems that our worship expressions and expectations are conditioned more by our culture than on Scripture and more influenced by TV and media than truth and tradition.
Now, the Dutch are forward thinkers, and innovative, and have recently pushed a new scheme onboard based on your facebook or linkedin accounts. You are now able to sit next to like minded individuals as selected by certain parameters on your likes and information stored on your profile. Obviously this sounds like a great idea, especially if you are a talkative soul and prefer to talk to someone rather than watching that 6 month old film you’ve seen countless times on DVD again.
Mr de Klerk also accused the ANC of seeking to enforce black domination over the racial minorities and erode South Africa's liberal constitution. Cronyism, corruption and "divisive racial politics" were rife in government, he added.
I've definitely slowed down a lot with my reading. I keep getting distracted with other things like TV, movies, comics, and video games. Only so much free time to go around, and the books are piling up!
I can’t escape you maybe
Segment 1 : Present (0,3) 000922F4H66E PCV4H66E
(ii) The whole of low lands between Rapti and Gandaki, except Butwal.
What influence that you hope your blog will have on others?
On there other hand, there is a downside: The first experience most of us would have with such a device would likely be seeing it in the hands of a cop who stopped us for speeding or some such thing and now wants to X-ray us and our trunk.
ADDRESS
Hop on over to Ashley's for more Scavenger Hunting:
I did,
3. My Father in heaven knows all my needs and will supply all my needs.
Today, Michael is taking me out for lunch. After the money I spent on the kids yesterday, I asked him if we were getting happy meals on our budget. He is actually planning to take me to Olive Garden I think which is one of my favorite places. They have a soup and salad weekday lunch special which I am going to get. My husband is a good man. He never blinks when I do things like go shopping or when things get to me. He just accepts it as it is and reassures me that things will get better and we will get through.
John Baldessari (1 set of gelatin silver prints with oil tint and polymer paint, 1986)
Several news stories, all out of Iowa's local press have come out about the vote rigging that saw the elite's top man Mitt (Mittens) Romney as the chosen man.
Before me in my dream;
100 Years of Gala Menus at the Musée Maxim’s
Valentine was found by Omya California Plant workers on Feb. 9 clinging to life after someone had reportedly beaten and abused the small pup, according to sheriff’s officials. Employees immediately called Sounds of Silent Spirits Rescue and Sanctuary president Regine Fonville for help. Fonville transported the puppy to Bear Valley Animal Hospital, where she’s been cared for since.
Quote from Racecar-engineering.com “One of the defences used by McLaren was that Stepney, the former Ferrari employee, was ‘whistle blowing’ – something the court struggled to accept covered the whole affair, but it did certainly have an effect at the Australian Grand Prix. Ferrari won the race, but the FIA later outlawed the car’s floor. McLaren contended that the Ferrari that won was illegal, and a letter from Stepney to the FIA sent after the hearing revealed that it may well have been, as it was in effect a mass damper. Such devices were banned last season as they were controversially deemed to be a moveable aerodynamic device.
I’m sick of all of this….
Two men dressed in combat gear – well, not exactly two, to be precise, more like one and a half – stood with their backs to her, gyrating their hips in time to the pulsating (and frankly irritating, being the type that sticks in your head for weeks) theme tune, in sync with the pneumatic animatics gyrating on the screen in front of them. The big one, she noticed with a certain shimmering undercurrent of excitement, was tall and rather muscular, and were those scars running down his exposed and neatly tanned arms? It didn’t look like a bottle tan to her, at least until the arms disappeared into the sleeves of that tightly fitting camo t-shirt of his. Perhaps he was a Mercenary, she thought with a little thrill, or Private Soldier as she had heard they preferred to be called. You can be my Private Soldier any day of the week. Squad dismissed. (Oh okay, you lot can stick around too.)
I choose to do the right things at all time, to God’s glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
Don't pretend to understand it. Just drink it in.
2.) What outfit should I wear that will be classic and timeless for years to come? I want to be trendy but I'm sure the lady in her engagement shoot from the 80's thought the same in her acid wash Jordache...
Me: what’s the matter why aren’t you eating
What are you waiting for? Go set it up!
On March 28, the Brooklyn Historical Society will host photographer Harvey Stein in a special discussion about his recent book, Coney Island: 40 Years, which documents the people, events and changing scene at Coney Island.
is a gift.
After the sun has set, she returns. She has a box in her arms.
It all goes silent. Suddenly the day of swimming, nursery, TV, shopping, collapses in on top of her and she is a crumpled heap on the floor with her thumb in her mouth and a towel round her, wanting to be cradled and cooed to, like a baby. I can imagine my wife holding her and kissing her damp forehead through the comma curls.
all you need is a pair of scissors!
I transferred it to the iPad. Obviously. And I didn’t really watch it – just listened to it. I propped it up on the seat and plugged in the headphones because it was hard to hear it with the car noise.
* severe eye pains and pressures, blurred vision, sensitivity to light
Gently fold in the fresh blueberries.
Every big girl has had fat comments thrown at them out of malice. It’s always laughable when these comments come out of the mouth of someone who is also a big bottomed personage.
Despite the many heavy subjects covered in the book it also manages to be laugh out loud funny at some points. There is a paricularly dry line I found hilarious:
Splattering to your surface,
1/8 tsp dry crushed red pepper flakes
Lt. Cmdr. Robert Randolph Elseth, 37, Vestal, N.Y.
V For Vendetta (Remember the Fifth of November and its connection to Halloween)
5:30-- Get up. (Legs sore from evening before.)
1 deep dish pie crust, slightly thawed
*5-6 Hand stamped cards a month (photographs only, you keep your cards)
How many came before, it really doesn’t matter, just as long as you’re the last
I feel like I need to bring up the hems of my wideleg trousers and invest in a pair of suspenders to go full-time mascu-femme, top it all off with a snappy fedora and voila! I already scuffed up the slippery leathery soles by walking around on the asphalt and they are going great so far. Perhaps for work, a pair of opaque black patterned tights, a slim skirt, and a high-necked Victorian blouse? Or for the weekend, black tights again with a mid-thigh skirt and summer tee. Back in black, as always!
To understand the women have to become a woman, and if it can become impossible, one can only accept women as they are - full of riddles and sweet charm of his personality.
- No more that about 10-12 chips dipped in salsa (that is one serving size that equals around 200 calories).
Here are some of the warning signs that our skills are becoming outdated:
It took me a while to get all the pieces cut out as I decided to make two in tande-m rather than going through the whole process again after I'd finished one. It took rather longer when I realised I had my perspex cutting guide the wrong way up so I had cut some of the pieces out too long (which can obviously easily be rectified) and some pieces too narrow (which can't).
Sometimes things don't work out. This lesson is as much a part of life as anything else she'll learn in college. She's learning it the hard way right now. And my heart is broken for her. It's hard to watch your own dreams die but I'd say it's even harder to watch your child's dream die. All I can say is, I'm glad I was able to be beside her as she navigates this new direction. There's nowhere else I'd rather be.
How much you need: Aim for 25 to 30 grams per day.
6) That he will not be horrified by the (great) Gathering (on the Day of Resurrection).
After being settled by Mary she sat at his feet listening in awe of the word he shared , as Martha passed them Going to and from the preparation area , Jesus said ” Martha Martha” why are you troubled and worried about many things one thing is needed and Mary has chosen the better part listening to his word!
* Sanjay Gupta: reason unspecified
News taken from Cnet.
they tell me the birds
Michael Hirsh, in “Capital Offense,” looks at the financial crisis of 2008, and Richard Wolffe delves into the Obama administration anew with “Revival.”
Keeping such secrets and automatically reverting to a minority language whenever the law is in sight or could hear, creates a disconnect from integration and an economy and rule of law within the national economy and national rule of law (such as it is). That can only be a strategic weakness when attempts are made to combat serious and organised crime, whatever the ideology for involvement in it.
But the Mariel boatlift happened and a blackout on most things in English took place in Cuba. For a couple of years, from 1980 to 1982, I don't recall watching too many shows, cartoons or movies in the Germanic language. They weren't totally eliminated from our tellies; they were just replaced mostly by imports from the old socialist bloc. So, instead of Huckleberry Hound and Yogi Bear, we had the Bolshevik Tio Stiopa (Uncle Stiopa), a tall and strong police officer who stood up for the weak and punished the bullies. Lolek and Bolek arrived from Poland about the same time as Statler and Waldorf abandoned their critics' box.
Anyway you'll never know
Without spoiling the fun, there is some rules to this challenge
On Sunday, tens of thousands of Americans who supported Barack Obama’s presidential campaign in 2008 will gather on the Mall to protest the president’s lack of action on a cause to which he had committed himself throughout the campaign: immigration reform.
It’s just not that fun for me.
Benjamin Franklin said “We must hang together or most assuredly we shall hang separately.”
After eating, waiting until everyone else finished eating, and then helping to clear the table, Rachel returned to her bedroom.
uppercaise blogged:
When we parked at Saujana Hotel (yes, Mommy was really lucky to get a vacant and valid parking spot despite being 1 hour late!), Juan Or became cranky but after some scolding from Mommy, he cooperated and went into the event room with Mommy. Upon entering the room, at a glance, all seats seemed occupied, but Mommy managed to find one empty chair meant for the media person! Anyway, who cares, Mommy went ahead to sit at the media chair - after all this event is meant for parents and their babies/kids, so how can Huggies expect a mother to be standing and carrying her child all the time when no effort has been made by either the Huggies or hotel staff to quickly bring a chair for Mommy?
(Isaiah 55:1-2)In the New Testament, the image is taken up again in a communication to new followers of Jesus. This is in reference to learning from God / listening to God / growing spiritually, and reminiscent of explanation #9 above:
07. Ain't Too Proud To Beg
‘Why did I have to born to this world if it will be like this? Why they raise me if they didn’t want me? Did they raise me just so that I can be their money machine? Their source of money? Why they didn’t let me work properly instead sell my body?’He smiles bitterly. “I should just die when I’m in my mother’s womb.”
First of all, there is the instrument for instance, the fleshy eye. It takes the sense-impressions to the center. The mind is then connected with the center and the external instruments, namely, the physical eye, ear, etc. The mind carries the impressions still further and presents them to the Intellect, the determinative faculty, which reacts. Then flashes out the idea of egoism, which self-arrogates and identifies with lower self. Then the mixture of action and reaction is presented to the Soul who perceives an object in the mixture.
ENQUIRER. Indeed, I have known men, who, while thoroughly believing in that which you call great psychic, or magic powers, laughed at the very mention of Witchcraft and Sorcery.
that nose, those lips!
‘All nations striving strong to make
I am frantically searching if I have HSN channel on my TV as the biggest cooking event of the season, HSN Cooks Spring Weekend Event presented by Bon Appétit will be on March 26-27, 2011.
In contrast, the young woman seated alone at Pleasant’s bar seemed isolated from the social swirl. All judgments aside, the contrast between the two images may say something about the variety in how we experience the world.
A law enforcement officer recently complimented me for being a teacher. He shared that he couldn’t understand how high school teachers put up with those little darlings day in and day out and that given his experience with some of today’s youth he respected my endurance. I responded that high school kids were really a lot of fun to spend time with, and that most of the students I taught were very well behaved in my classroom. I suggested that the individual cases that he interacted with were in fact the exception.
My daughter went to live with her dad in January and she seems to have settled well in her new school and has made lots of friends at school and home so I am very pleased with my decision to let her go.
I'm getting by. I'm determined that this time will be "easier" simply because I know what to expect and I know where to get some help.
9C. GPS, Geocaching, and Locative Media – TEL 217
i wanted her to leave an almost empty soap bottle behind,
I did have another treat today, a treat for me anyway.
Water Filter
So, The steak is pretty much self-explanatory. Heat grill, add rub to steak, grill, rest, serve! Before the steak was thrown on the grill (a.k.a. George), I grilled up some red onions and zucchini spears with a little olive oil and salt and pepper. I also got a box of couscous going (such hard work!). The dip in the back is a yogurt, sour cream, cucumber mixture similar to raita (a.k.a. Indian cuisine happiness). Oh and I threw in some feta, because there is always room for feta (or is it Jell-o?). The only thing missing was pita!
In this exclusive interview with NAM's Earl Ofari Hutchinson, Waters’ discusses the ethics charges against her, the targeting of Congressional Black Caucus members for ethics violations, the effect on the Democratic Party, her constituents, and the relation to the fall elections.
Then what’s the problem?
Ink – Versamark, Black
It's been another tough week for The Ranter in more ways than one. However, at work today there was a wee pleasant surprise.
And I'd like to believe in this. But it's not something that answer questions like why did the Holocaust happen, or why is my son sick, or that has anything to do with our miniscule daily lives on this miniscule planet. It's too big to hang our daily problems on, but some humans, like perhaps Jesus, or perhaps Buddha, or perhaps Muhammed, have been able to tap into this greater understanding and to try to describe it, using symbolic language that is relevant to the period they lived in.
"Well, obviously. Temmer was a hero full stop." Hard to keep from sounding too defensive. It felt odd to hear a stranger call the old Gatemaker a hero, though, as if Van Raighan was taking a piece of her away.
HSN host Colleen Lopez — no relation to the diva — posted this on Facebook today.
Take the old peanut butter issue. Peanut butter on bananas, apples, or celery is a great snack in between meals. Thing is, if you're like me, you end up eating a scoop of peanut butter per bite of banana, which adds up to some serious caloric intake. So trick yourself.
I was hiking in nature,
When Russell and Shannon decided to go to Belgium to live and work we readily agreed to store all their furniture in, around and under our house for the ONE year that they would be away.
I absolutely love the way her room turned out! The colors are a little off in some of these pictures as the blue is a little more vibrant (think tiffany box blue). I really cannot wait to see her sweet face sleeping in this girly room!
Hope you all like the invitations.
1967
My mom and I used to make box ornaments out of Christmas cards. I'm not sure I remember how anymore,but they were pretty cute!
We got into the examination room and she did great looking through all the various devices and doing what she was told. Then came time for the eye drops. I had attempted to prepare the staff about Katie. When I called to make the appointment I had told them that she has autism and that she does not like having her face/head messed with. I TOLD them that putting in the eye drops to dilate her eyes was going to be an issue. “Oh don’t worry, we deal with children all the time.” Well, you haven’t dealt with MY kid. When we arrived at the appointment, I reminded them, “My daughter has autism and she doesn’t like having her face messed with. The eye drops are going to be a problem.” Again, “Oh, don’t worry, we deal with children all the time.” *sigh* When it came time for the eye drops, I told the assistant, “Katie has autism. She does not like having her face messed with. This is going to be a challenge.” “Oh, it will be fine. I work with kids all the time.” What happened next was straight out of a time passed where they tortured patients at hospitals… They laid her back in the chair and I could see her beginning to panic. Then, the assistant came to stand over her and tried talking to her. The hands came up to the face and the yelling/crying began. Katie is a very vocal and verbal child. She is FULLY capable of relating to those around her how much she dislikes a situation, and she did just that. I stood back and watched in absolute horror/vindication. I tried to tell them! I mostly stood by to see the man struggle with the situation, but I finally took pity on him and I went over to help by holding her hands down. I told her over and over again, “Let the man do his job. You need to have these eye drops to make sure your eyes are healthy.” All the while getting louder and louder. She was also getting louder and louder. I can only imagine what the people in the other exam rooms were thinking. Now, since her hands were pinned down, she scrunched her eyes up. The poor man (kid really) tried to get the drops in. He had us go out to the waiting room while the drops did their stuff. Poor Katie was all red from crying and she was all sweaty from the stress the whole situation had caused her. But, she was happy to be done with it all and enjoyed looking at all the glasses. After about twenty minutes, the man (kid) came back to check her eyes… We had to try the drops again. The first go round didn’t take. *FUCK*
“Herein lie buried many things which if read with patience may show the strange meaning of being black here at the dawning of the Twentieth Century. This meaning is not without interest to you, Gentle Reader; for the problem of the Twentieth Century is the problem of the color line. I pray you, then, receive my little book in all charity, studying my words with me, forgiving mistake and foible for sake of the faith and passion that is in me, and seeking the grain of truth hidden there”.
Think – have in
“I have something I’ve been saving for you.” I help out my hand palm up, knowing well the routine that was coming. You were careful to give me the dime heads up. This was the tradition that you started for us.
When out on the lawn there arose such a clatter,
Skirts that show panties - this costume led to... either the costume or the song, or the video being banned. Can't be bothered to check. Girls' day: "Twinkle Twinkle" and buddy, if you're watching this video for the music... you're lying. (discussed here and here)
Hello friends! time for another new challenge over at Simon Says and this week is all about Clean and Simple and if I do say so myself this is right up my alley, the DT gals are using fun products from Lawn Fawn and La La Land Crafts...
All songs written and produced by Neil Innes.
Confession: Dan and I are massive Pointless nerds. Dan usually watches it while I'm getting ready for work, which often results in my getting v. sidetracked from the getting ready. If we've nothing to watch, we'll iPlayer an episode we've not seen. We might have secret aspirations to be contestants on there. In lieu of that, though, I managed to get us tickets to see it being filmed!
Sunnies: Lena Hoschek
“When do his exams start?” E asked, surprised.
I never got a good explanation for what exactly happened back there.
Before you get hot under the collar about this, let me just tell you that I learned about counting words in sentences from a guy who is damn fine writer: T. Jefferson Parker. He's got a couple of Edgar Awards that show I'm not the only one who thinks so.
This may sound very strange and unbelievable to you, but it is real and true. Being a widely popular traveled man, he must have been in contact with you in the past or simply you were nominated to him by one of his numerous friends here or abroad who wished you well. Late Steve Job, the reclusive American-born philanthropist born in San Francisco, California.USA.
Do you ever smell books?
“You can do whatever,” Luther replied turning back to the appointment book.
I shook my head. She knew I wasn't satisfied with that answer. Then she looked directly into my eyes and said, "Jeff, it's me. I know you trust me, you always have, and you have to trust me now. There was no other way. Through Katie, you will understand. Her future will guide you to the answers you need."
In 2008, millions of well-meaning Americans decided to give someone who struck them as a nice young man a shot at the most difficult job in the world. They did this mostly for good reasons, for many of the same reasons that we’re in the debt mess that we’re in. They gave Obama a chance a the presidency maybe because they agreed with him, maybe out of guilt, but mostly because they’re nice.
Arnold Pears, Uppsala University, CeTUSS (national center for pedagogical development in technology education in a societal and student oriented context)
Even before the start of the race, the full-marathoners were already treated like champions. We were given special parking lots just in front of the Sepang International Circuit’s main entrance. The race was to start at 8 pm, but I’d reached at 6 pm, to avoid traffic congestion and do a proper, thorough warm-up. I can’t remember how many ITB stretches that I’d done that evening!
The Teacher's Edition includes lesson plans, correlating worksheets, and reminders of the feature video and game for this issue. A planning calendar lists the topics covered for the whole year so you can plan ahead. Each issue is correlated to the Common Core Standards.
When you pass through the waters, I will be with you; and when you pass through the rivers, they will not sweep over you. When you walk through the fire, you will not be burned; the flames will not set you ablaze. (Isaiah 43:2 NIV)
Fellow Toastmasters and welcome guests, can I get a show of hands of how many of you like sci-fi? Good! You’re in for a treat.
BRB. In completely unrelated news, I’ve decided to take a break from heavy blogging. I’ve recently reacquainted with my first love- fiction. I finally finished writing a story (two years after I wrote my last story) plus I’ve got a few buns in the oven just waiting to be written. Like most infants, they need all the attention they can get and so to do that, I decided to limit my blogging. *hangs up Do Not Disturb sign* See you in a few weeks (hopefully with something good)! ■
Cook and stir until bubbly, stirring occasionally until cranberry skins pop.
On the wedding front, things have more or less come to a screeching halt. I need to find motivation, and soon. Tom's ring has arrived, and mine will be coming home as well in the next week or so, now it is just a matter of deciding what to engrave inside. While at the mall to pick up Tom's ring, we stopped by a Things Remembered store and ordered our serving set. More on that later. I talked to my bridal shop on Thursday and found out that my dress was scheduled for shipment the next day, so it should be arriving sometime this week. I have also started working on our programs and the next edition of our bridal party newsletter.
"Having babies is a revolutionary thing. You must reproduce!"
Got my hair dyed- I've never had it dyed before and I was always worried about how it turned out. I got it dyed in a really cool looking two-tone.
That really hit me – I really didn’t know much after all.
On Saturday night we went out for a celebration meal in the village hall. The occasion that we were celebrating was sixty years of the village hall and at the same time the newly installed kitchen was being christened. The village hall had been smartened up in an attempt to make it look more like a bistro than a sixty year old prefabricated village hall. Eleven six seating tables had been arranged around the hall with the top table on the stage. The meal was cooked by the two sons of one of the committee members and served by young ladies who live in the village. The diners all looked quite smart with some men wearing jackets and ties and many of the ladies wearing dresses or skirts rather than the usual trousers or jeans. Husband and I only knew one of the fellow diners on our table, so during the course of the evening we made three new friends.
U.S. households on average spend 41% of their food budgets outside their homes, according to the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics' Consumer Expenditure Survey (the proportion is 44% for singles). While you may think you're saving money dining off the dollar menu, you could be courting health problems, since the cheapest fast food items are often the ones loaded with fat and sugar. The foods that should be filling half your plate -- fruits and vegetables -- may be hard to find or overly processed when you buy them from fast-food outlets, so ultimately you'll save money and eat better preparing food at home.
Anyway, for those of you looking for unique, definitely will use, bridesmaid and groomsmen gifts, or even for a friend’s birthday, I highly suggest you take a look at Molla Space. Here are a few images of their products. The first is a Perfume Atomizer and the second is a Teardrop iPod Water Resistant Bathroom Speaker.
Kaufman moves the story to the inner city...which helps create the constant sense of paranoia (the F.B.I. headquarters is in the background of several shots!!), off-kilter camera angles,some shots filmed in half light and the protagonists are almost always observed by faces at windows and strangers in hallways...unbeknownst to them of course,all add to the uneasy feeling of paranoia!In one scene, Matthew (Donald Sutherland)calls Washington for help, only to find his calls are being intercepted and his name is known to the person on the other line before he gives it. This scene summons up the sort of anti-government fears that were very strong at the time due to Americas involvement in Vietnam.
As for my outfit, it not as colorful as the ones in the film, but it carries a bit of the same charm to me. I've had this top for a while, bought back during my ruffle obsession of 2005 maybe and have had trouble wearing it. I did wear it more back when I first bought it, but now I just feel it makes my boobs look weird. I decided to try tying that satin ribbon around my neck as a bow, and I like it works wonderfully! And the shorts I just love now that I took out the cuff in them. They suffered a similar fate as the shirt, since I decided I didn't quite like wear they ended on my thighs. When I tried them on in the store, I had the aist pulled lower down than it actually fits on me. The shorts are also the first jean shorts I have ever really like, since mose of the other ones in store have a trailer trash vibe to me: short and messy. The whole nice shorts treand that has taken hold is my favorite! I would wear shorts, miniskirts, and minidresses all the time if I could. Oh wait, I already do...
‘Oh, I’m OK. They canceled my medical though.’
I wanna help people who may not always deserve it.
Walt Disney World
In a large bowl, combine soups, salsas and milk and mix until smooth. Stir in chicken, black beans and onion. Grease a 9x13 inch baking dish and spread about 1/2 cup chicken mix over the bottom of the pan. Break up 5 tortillas and place over chicken mixture in pan. Top with 1/3 chicken mixture, then 1/3 of the cheese. Repeat layers 2 more times ending with cheese. Bake at 300 for 1 hour.
It’s taken me well over a week to write these few short blurbs. Even now, I am hesitant to post this as it reveals too much truth about my own personal thoughts and feelings. It lacks the ambiguity that I find so comforting, but if I don’t admit that I am having difficulty, how can I hope to help someone else admit they might be struggling also.
Costume designs! I love that category.
The trouble is, the intercom doesn’t work if you use the arrows on the keypad to scroll through the door numbers, you have to type my door number in and press the bell button. I have missed I don’t know how many parcels because of this. It bugs me because they could just knock on the door! It bugs me even more because the delivery office takes an hour to get to!
Whether it’s traffic-free mass participation rides through our cities or cycling as a competitive sport to encourage excellence among the best in the country, Sport18’s India Cyclothon presents opportunities for elite and amateur cyclists, for beginners, children, families and even institutions to express their solidarity for a cause by saddling up and cycling in traffic-free mass participation rides in urban areas.
Now, about that little coping thing…
LET'S CELEBRATE TODAY!
SUPPRESSED TECHNOLOGY INCLUDING ANTIGRAV AND ‘STARGATES’
Few people have enjoyed a closer association with jump racing in the last 30 years than John Patrick ’J P’ McManus, who was born on a farm in Co Limerick on March
I'm improving .... I guess.
Cheryl: Don’t ignore the business side to writing. It’s just as important as creating a good book. Do your research before submitting a manuscript to a publisher/agent. Have a marketing plan in place so they know you’re serious about your writing.
Montana has some neat-looking rock formations. The national monument here is called Pompey's Pillar, and there, you can see ancient Native American petroglyphs, as well as the honest-to-goodness signature of William Clark, of the famed Lewis and Clark expedition. His signature is dated July 25, 1806, and since then, many others have defaced the rock by etching their names into it. (But I didn't think you'd much care that Mary loved Billy in 1890.)
And finally, more patterns to stitch! I purchased the two in the back and Hannah Skinner from Kathy at Carriage House Samplings. The little angel was a snag off Ebay.
Online shopping: the lowdown
How to Turn your Odds in the Casinos
Before I go to sleep. S.J.Watson
RV parks have started putting ironing boards in laundry rooms and they may even loan you an iron. You'll probably want to carry your own iron just in case.
No, I'm not gonna whistle-blow the hell out of this one. I just could not believe the depths to which my bored mind would go to create a busybody mountain out of a pile of bamboo. I'd much rather have been schlepping up to the Catskills to assist with all their mess rather than creating messes of my own. I'd also have liked it if the weather had gone further west in order to put this out. Sure, Texas has Rick Perry, but it doesn't deserve to go up in flames.
I hate talking on the phone, but I get upset when it doesn't ring.
It's very important to me that my children know God's word, not just what they've heard me say, or heard in church, but that they know it because they are very familiar with it from reading it day in and day out. I know how that affects each day for me, and I want that for them.
Your turn: Have you had the opportunity to be a guest blogger? Send us the link and we’ll check it out!
We considered taking the Staten Island Ferry, but ran out of time, and while I'm sure the evening ride is beautiful, we weren't so sure about walking around Battery Park at night, just the three of us, particularly while protests had people sleeping on the sidewalks there. So we turned for home at about 9, found our way to PATH and our stop on the other side of the river, then marched the last five blocks "home." As V put it in her journal tonight, "we're all a bit footsoar but happy."
The brutal treatment meted out to Soni Sori, and the prevailing situation of conflict and repression in Chhattisgarh, cause us grave concern about Soni in particular, and the situation of women prisoners, in general.
Beth: Miles 1-6, don’t have tons to say here because I was familiar with this route from running the half last year. I wasn’t soaking at this point and felt good running. In mile 4 I saw a lady holding a sign that said “You are a Marathoner” and that was when the tears made their first attempt to show themselves. I knew I still had a lot of miles to cover but I was on my way to being a marathoner!
I had halibut served with a herb crust and a pea and ham risotto (£19!). There was a lot going on this dish in terms of flavour but it worked really well and the fish had enough flavour and texture to not get lost under it all.
* The Philadelphia Negro, W.E.B. DuBois's exhaustively-researched contribution to the 19th century corpus on 'the Negro question.' (1899)
I was warned from a very young age about the dangers… the vortexes around the wave-breakers, I learned about the tides and their effects.
CHICAGO has no heart. And it has no original thought. It glorifies insincerity. It is a soulless, derivative machine.
Thank you, Penelope Cruz, for wearing blue. I love blue, and she looks great in this dress that is an absolute classic. The dress has volume without overwhelming her, and her jewelry is understated while still adding enough sparkle to the look.
We've essentially turned a blind eye towards Pakistan's treachery and enabled it because we need to bribe them. Around 75% of the supplies needed for our war in landlocked Afghanistan comes through the Pakistani port of Karachi and travels overland via the Torkhum Pass, which is why we've been paying Pakistan off to the tune of billions per year. And while we've finally begun the process of paying baksheesh to five countries instead of one to lessen the impact of our deteriorating relations withPakistan, it isn't nearly complete yet and will likely not have that much of an impact since our leaving Afghanistan is fairly imminent. So we'll do nothing now.
Future Ex-Cons
The Hearth ~
Through the depths of the Cambrian fen
It hit 70 degrees F today, the snow here is gone and the grass is greening up. In light of that it seems a bit silly, to buy firewood. Starla helped me stack it on the porch. I would say it is about 3/4 of a cord of dry split larch and fur. In January a long term weather forecaster said that April was going to be cold and snowy, so I now feel prepared. If not it will be here for next year or I could always sell it for 60 dollars and a fishing pole.
It's all so complicated, and I that's all I want to share, at this time.
Nevertheless, or especially so, housing is heavily influenced by trends and norms. It has been over the last century and continues to be a play ball of the latest fashion. It does however, also reflect as much as any other fashion niche represent retrospectively the believes and values of each area.
Now sit back and enjoy an informative email every once-in-awhile when your name comes up. Somebody talking smack about you? You might just find out. Something hurting your prospective employment due to people googling your name? Now you can find out and ask them not to use your last name, or to take it down / make it private / move it to a new URL because it’s now in the cache where it will persist, possibly for 2 years. And if you find out it’s me who’s doing it (quite likely), please ask nice. I am always willing to change someone’s last name to an initial, even retroactively.
1037 **D-I/4/1989. “Questions for American Law Students in Britain.” London Program, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, George Williams House, London, England. (Incorporated in Item 1991(2), above, pp. 1071-83.)
In this season when Mango, 'the king of fruits' is available every where, I thought of making something special with this for my kid. So I started thinking and experimenting for a new dish and finally landed on this wonderful creamy 'Mango Mousse" dessert recipe. This presentation has been conceptualized by my kid.
Sunday night, though....achoo!
Publisher: Scholastic
I've started a post or two about being single in a world where being married (or engaged) seems much more desirable - to me and to those around me. I've been frustrated and hurt when not included in "couply" occasions like dinner parties. And, I've felt left out of "family" events because I'm a single mom.
As you all know it's Friday which means Friday Follow in the Blog World. Last week there were over 300 people who participated in this event! Amazing.
Today I have a birthday card to show you.
That was all it took to catch the attention of the apocalyptically minded. David Berg aka Moses David, leader of the Children of God sect, did the most to publicize a Kohoutek apocalypse; his proclamation that the comet would destroy the world in January of 1974, printed on bright orange flyers, was handed out by his followers to people all over North America. (I think I may still have one in a file box in the basement.) All through the last months of 1973, the comet had something of the same cachet that the supposed end of the Mayan calendar has today.
I posted about that experience and I'm sharing the good news now for three reasons. First, runners have a higher incident of skin cancer than the average non-runner because of our exposure to the sun. I knew this before discovering I had melanoma, but never really took it seriously. "It won't happen to me. I don't have any family history of skin cancer. I'll put on sun screen next time." I even blogged about the higher chance of skin cancer in runners. But when it came to practicing what I was preaching, I fell short. It took a brick falling on my head (actually a mole on my back) to wake me up to the seriousness of sun exposure.
“Do you know where this bus is now?”
And as the birds fly into the late afternoon diction of Radio FMs
Also, in my Finance 315 class, we're covering bond (debt) instruments and how these are repaid. A thorough examination of the different types of bonds can help investors make the right financing decisions. The drawback with bonds, however, is that if a company is ever to go bankrupt, an investor may never receive any return or portion of his or her investment, as the company must paid all its other debts first; and then whatever is left over goes to the repayment of the bonds. Government-issued bonds are seen as more secure, as the government is seen as having the means for repayment. What I also discovered is that while some bonds may not be practical for earning returns, they may help in financing long-term retirement. The chapter also referred the reader--me--to different websites to see the different interest rates for different types of bonds. A good way to do research on one's own beyond the classroom. ;)
“Everything else — you make it yourself. These are both meditative training, and self-control in regard to emotional states. Our emotions — are the states of ourselves (as consciousnesses). Emotions — they are just the states of consciousness, rather than facial expressions or electrical processes in the brain, those are only external reflections or after-effects of emotions!
Visitors can spend hours gazing at the tree’s multitude of carvings, which depict creatures from all walks of life…even Mickey Mouse! Ten artists and three Imagineers worked for 18 months straight to etch 325 carvings into the tree’s concrete plaster “bark.” The animal depictions flow smoothly into one another, twisting and curving with the structure of the tree. The design reaches into a sprawling canopy of nearly 8,000 branches, accented by over 100,000 man-made leaves. The leaves rustle realistically in the breeze, further adding to the illusion of the tree’s authenticity.
She kind of forgot about her doll for awhile until Tina called asking about clothes. We knew her doll would be coming soon. The day it arrived we picked up her older brother from Middle school and we pulled in the driveway, there was the box. Carly dashed out of the car and got her new baby. She is SO proud that she wrote her own name. She has taken it just about everywhere and showed everyone. I love that we will have a treasured reminder of her precious 5 year old writing.
63. Miriam Makeba - For What It's Worth (3:08)
Both have since left the corporation. After a brief stint with a new CEO and board, the broadcaster is once again in the process of appointing a new board and CEO.
A happy note: This year’s 2 baby eagles, David and Alexandra, are active, healthy and strong and are getting ready to fly, any day now. (30 seconds into that video clip)
I have to say that at times like this, with all this conflict over the leadership, words fail me. The secondary blogs, like ‘Butler Exposed’ and comments like ‘Barnbrook’s gay,’ have to stop! The lack of principle and individual loyalty in this Party is horrifying. I stand aghast as I watch all around me people putting themselves and their petty grievances, personal ambition and naked gain before the good of the Party and the country. This is not why I joined the BNP. We have to be the people of principle. We will only succeed through decency, sincerity, honour and self sacrifice.
She's concealing the dismal circles around her almond eyes, proof that she's abusing caffeine. She's casting a coal shadow on her eyelids and it's obviously making her insides hurl. She's mixing the fine, soot particles against her pale and wan bronze, a sign that she's innately multi-coloured. Same goes for her short-lived lashes; she's painting them with a volumisant, recourbant tube of mascara.
You drink it plain, and it taste sweet and "nutty".
Never ingest undiluted essential to instructions and always stay with when employing hair care goods for lice. their eggs, named nits, can look like dandruff. Incubation lasts about seven days later and lice children were born.
Mark Mullins of Bonerama: New Orleans is well known for its Brass bands, but my all time favorite is Bonerama. They aren't just a classic Brass band, but take trombones, a guitar and a drumset and rock you with funk, jazz, soul and sex. Mark is the lead trombonist, singer and writer, and he gyrates on stage in a way that a man with a trombone just shouldn't.
2 leaves bay leaves
Nothing like losing an hour the week before SXSW to get you prepared for how awake you'll be at 11PM and dead you'll be at 11AM. Who doesn't love the annual Sunday of only 23 hours? I heard someone say the other day that they should jump the clocks ahead an hour on Friday afternoon so we can lose an hour of the work day rather than an hour of sleep.
INXS Original sin AUS
Bill Whittle (BillWhittleChannel) has prepared and published a comprehensive video detailing the sources of all U.S. income and spending for fiscal year 2011. From it, we learn that of the $3.8 trillion spent, $2.2 trillion was used for entitlement spending (social security, medicare, unemployment, food stamps, etc). This is the same number received in revenues. This means that all the money we taxpayers paid was given directly to entitlement recipients. Since there isn't any money left over, the government must borrow the difference for it to operate (paying salaries, retirement, funding all agencies, NASA, the armed forces, cost of war, etc).
"A full and good life for all includes a fair sharing of wealth"
You laughing yet?
But having wallowed in a bit of strictly non-substance related nostalgia; I have come to a conclusion. One song that, for me at least, has strong links to that time is from none of the bands so far mentioned, but from those mod-rockers, The Who. Of course the song in question is ‘I Can See For Miles’. Released in the relevant window of late 1967, it sees the Who on the rise to their creative peak probably around 1969/70 and uses so much studio enhanced ingenuity and complicated harmonies that, like many of its contemporaries, it was impossible to reproduce live without it sounding a tad on the thin side.
Saying that, I can’t manage to listen to this song all day as it would render me completely cathartic and unable to do anything. I’ve only ever listened to it sober but I imagine on some type of drugs, would take it to a whole different level.
If she ever has a spotted lamb, then I will know she has the spotting gene. If she does carry the spotting gene, there is only a 1 in 4 chance she will have a spotted lamb.
1/2 tsp white sesame seeds
But what was not mentioned at the time was that, while we have committed over £1 billion in aid to this country, India itself is a major aid donor, in particular to Afghanistan. And, with the announcement from Indian prime minister Manmohan Singh to the Afghan parliament that it is committing an additional $500 million for various developmental projects, this now brings total Indian aid to Afghanistan to over $2 billion.
Tanith Lee – The Hill
This one we got for 'G' at the world market. Comes with a piece of chalk. Write a message with the coffee!
And I am mad. So freaking mad.
My back pain limits how much I can do. And my memory is also going, and I’m realizing the limitations that will mean too. Don’t get me wrong, I’m still functional, I just function differently. I’m getting some insights on what it means to get old and frail. My next door neighbor is 93, and can’t walk much because of a stroke. She spends her days sitting in a chair watching TV. I can now see a path from where I’m at, to where she’s at. I know I’ve got to be prepared for a lot more limitations. Maybe it’s lucky that I have all that practice at watching TV, because if I had been an extreme sports kind of guy it would have been much harder to give it all up.
i put some leftover fabric from my chair project in a frame i already had for some graphic "artwork", and used black and white photos for the frames. the prefontaine poster was a copy i made of a sports illustrated poster jordan had (he's a runner, so he loves prefontaine). the deer head cup/vase is from tuesday morning, and the big lantern was a thrift store find (originally from JC Penney). the gigantor silver wishbone was a gift from my dad - isn't it cool? little gold tealight holders were from target a few christmases ago, and the glass jug was from marshall's (i tied some rope around it).
4) Viloet Ebine touran
Islam and the Greco-Roman cultural heritage
Wes from Jaybarkerfan's Junk filled up a box with random Braves cards. I'm sorry I didn't have time to scan in any examples, but it was loaded with Greg Maddux cards and early 90's stuff that surprisingly I didn't have. I loved seeing names such as Steve Avery, Mark Lemke, Rafael Belliard and Sid Bream staring back at me. Thank you for cards. It was a great way to unwind after the past couple of crazy (and scary) days we've been through.
Length: 50 pages
Tucson Electric Receives $25 Million Grant For Bright Tucson Solar Power Plant In U.S. 13
Next week we're off on the yearly expedition to Suffolk and my favourite Weird & Wonderful Wood fair. Please stop by and say hello at our tent, should you be in the Eastern Angles and wishing for an afternoon amongst dendric delights.
A few evenings ago, I was taken by surprise at the sound of seagulls flying overhead. I've seen them congregating in parking lots where they expect to find fast food flung out of car windows, and they're usually found on larger lakes in the area throughout the summer, but I wasn't expecting to see flocks of them flying over Lonewolf in late April.
For the sake of simplicity, I will concede the fact that the doctors had five instances of where they "should have known" and didn't, or did and didn't tell the parents was agreed to by the court. Whether any of that is actual fact, I'm not sure. Nor am I convinced that there were indeed five separate occasions of negligence.
She tosses playful glances over her shoulder,
My mind is filled with a dense fog of unresolved thoughts. I try to make sense of the world, but nothing comes through.
This article from Jeff Sabo is worth a read. He talks about how teaching can definitely be a part of unschooling. Unschooling is about freedom of choice, not about learning everything all by yourself!
5 Tbs. unsalted butter
Forgiveness is a gift you give yourself. When you harbor angry feelings against someone it festers inside you like poison. Many times the other person never admits any wrong doing or never asks for forgiveness. People react differently to hurt and some wrongs are more painful than others. It doesn’t matter who is right or wrong – people are entitled to their feelings.
Eight caravan pitches were put up in Eaves Lane, Meriden in April 2010.
The past couple weeks have been a bit of a roller coaster ride for me. I wake up feeling great one day, and sick the next. I vacuumed my apartment for the first time a couple weeks ago and I think I kicked up some major dust that sent my sinuses on fire, making the next couple days miserable. I finally got better, and then my sleep patterns were a bit messed up, and I spent a day at work exhausted.
"Yep, sure does. That's why I asked. I can't seem to get a good haircut in this town."
The Lilacs are blooming here at StoneGable and the air is filled with their perfume! It floats through our open windows and drifts from room to room. I wait all year for just a few days when the lilacs boom and cast their fragrant spell!
As for the barbecue:
Dembowski a donkey (Dem for Democrat) with a bow on a ski
Look what the sun brought out while I was in Swindon.
1 tbsp of dried oregano
Walking back up through the town (this is the back view of Stokes Coffee House) slowly, with full tummies. The children were in good spirits and not trying to kill each other for once. What a happy day!
“Being secretive again?” She suggested and waltzed down the landing, “Oh, Mum says dinner’s ready.”
The top center picture is my “true to Arizona” lunch of grilled cactus at Oaxaca Restaurant. It was surprisingly filling, a bit tart, and well-balanced with the spices in the sauce. The frugal part of me was quite pleased as I was given chips and salsa (unlike the other tables around me), and checking in on Facebook gave me a free dessert of “Death by Chocolate” cookie sundae, leaving my total bill under $7 and the foodie part of me quite pleased.
We can confirm that Bukola Saraki has submitted himself to police hqters, Abuja and is being interrogated at the moment.
IDF Elite Unit Combats Hamas Smuggling Tunnels by idfnadesk תיעוד: חיסול המחבל מטולוז שרצח ארבעה יהודים by newsonlinenet Don’t Just Learn about Matzot – Bake Them by IsraelNationalTV HILARIOUS VIDEO: Joe Biden’s “Unintentional” Lubrication Speech French Muslims Whine About Toulouse Massacre “Backlash” Terrorist arrested before he could attack near Eilat And again: ‘Human rights council’ to ‘investigate’ whether and if the ‘settlements’ hurt ‘Palestinians’
As Colt starts to uncover secrets he is quickly and drawn into a secret world that involves flying motorcycles, aliens, shape shifters and secret gateways between alternate universes.
I read the back side of St. Monica’s prayer card and set it aside, but her expression stayed with me.
I wonder about greed. I had a personal discussion with another professional athlete on the topic who was very defensive of Albert. “He’s the best ever, he deserves it” was his position. I disagree. I do agree that he HAS been among the best but he does not, nor does ANYONE deserve over 200 million dollars to play ball. My assessment, for what it is worth is: Albert is greedy.
5. What Christmas song do you dread hearing?
Then the boys and I played a round of croquet as thejerseyshoredad made chocolate dipped fruit (oranges, pineapple & strawberries) and chocolate dipped pretzels too. He also made a tray of Manicotti for supper. I had made a tray earlier in the week, but we were having company so he made a 2nd tray. Oh and did I mention he made a pot of sauce the day before so could make the manicotti? Can't forget the sausage either!
“We were very happy with Susan as she helped us through a difficult situation. Thanks is just not enough to say for what she did!”
Not two hours later on our patio appeared this gorgeous Eastern Milk Snake. It only measured about 12 inches probably, but reared it's head and followed our every move. This time, I was lucky enough to get my camera in time. By the way, as threatening as he may look, this species of New York snake is harmless. He is seeking rodents and likes to eat other snakes. I must admit, however, if I had been alone I would have probably fainted if I saw this moving around.
Considerable innovation is occurring in China in both the business- to-consumer and business-to-business sectors. Although breakthroughs in either space generally go unrecognized by the broader global public, many multinational B2B competitors are acutely aware of the innovative strides the Chinese are making in sectors such as communications equipment and alternative energy. Interestingly, even as multinationals struggle to cope with Chinese innovation in some areas, they seem to be holding their own in others.
$32.00 including shipping
100g white chocolate chunks
told the kids to go outside and not list all the things to watch out for (fear of losing control),
we caught the culprit and suffocated it.
It has one of the most compelling opening chapters I have ever read. I read this in Swedish, but it is translated into English by Jennifer Brown Baverstam. Fogelström in the opening of the book makes the city into a character in its own right. He paints a picture of the city as both a protector and an enemy. These are the last few lines of the opening chapter (my translation):
But I got lost
It might seem above that I am saying that WordPress is unequivocally better. But that is is not my point. Whether you should choose WordPress or Tumblr (assuming you have narrowed down your choice of blog to these two, though there ARE other nice blogging sites) will depend on how you plan to use your blog. If you want your audience to be a group of close friends, and you don’t feel too serious about blogging, then I would recommend Tumblr, as it’s easy to set up, easy to connect.
The story focuses on three major characters. Raoden was the heir to the throne of Arelon, until he woke up one morning as an Elantrian zombie. He is cast into Elantris and tries to make the most of his situation, uniting the street gangs and trying to instill hope for the first time since Elantris’ fall. Raoden is determined to figure out the secrets of the Aons and to restore Elantris to its former glory.
Sayers also has some insightful comments on the Middle Ages, and on the war between Saracen and Christian (timely today, which is another reason waiting until 2011 to read this was a good thing).
Wishing all of you a wonderful week ahead.
But I'm also not sure what to write about now. I used to write detailed multi-part fantasies, which was a lot of fun...but it was also time-consuming and hard work, and I lack both the inspiration and the energy for that now. Even Flash Fiction Friday, which I've dearly loved, isn't giving me the spark it used to. Last week's picture was one I'd ordinarily gobble right up, but I let it pass untouched.
For dinner, we had reservations at The Kitchen, a restaurant in the Hard Rock Hotel. Since I was on vacation and living it up, I ordered a Pina Colada. The waiter asked me if I wanted to try Blue Suede Shoes instead; he said, “It has pina colada and crushed bananas in it; it’s really good.” So, I said yes. Cut to an hour later, where I was laughing so hard I thought I was going to pee my pants. I have no idea what was in that drink, but it was NOT just pina colada and bananas. I fell asleep to the sounds of my own giggling, which is not easy to do.
Forensic Ballistics is concerned with the scientific and technological analysis of all ballistic related evidence and related phenomenon, with the sole purpose of assisting the criminal justice system in establishing the true facts in a particular case.
Yield: serves 8
Has anybody thought this through? Ok, the Lancing FC pitch is only used once or twice a week, but even then the light can be seen from the A27 at Shoreham and the match and spectators can be easily heard half a mile away. However, unlike the existing pitch, the new plan is to have additional floodlit pitches that are likely to be in use most nights of the week – in the middle of a residential area with lots of young families. So the residents of both Mash Barn and Crabtree / North Road areas will be subjected to light and noise nuisance most evenings together with the extra traffic and parking issues that will accompany these ‘attractions’.
OK, I didn't quite follow ALL the guidelines...greys (instead of bright colours), stamped crow (replacing bright flower), Pan Pastels (instead of acrylic paint) and cardstock (instead of canvas)...but I think I have incorporated the "techniques" that we were taught just the same! Just in my own way.
I stayed up too late last night playing with my iPhone and hanging out with Siri, asking her stupid questions just to see what she'd say. I woke up very tired and kept zoning out while I was getting ready for work. I forgot to rinse out the conditioner from my hair, so my hair was a little funky today.
At the office for years my coworkers have boasted about their time at the gym where their dedication has paid off and they are able to prove real weight loss and (now post-gym) firmer muscles. The majority of my co-workers doing the boasting are 50 plus. In short a bunch of cougars (including myself). Well after having 9 kids and remaining a size 8 (mostly throughout) the gym was just never something I was attracted to or really even remotely interested in. The amount of harried housework I do here (after my 40 hour regular work week at an outside job) seemed sufficient. That was until the 12-year-old announced that although I was “thinner” than all the moms she knew…I had “flabby” arms and legs. (!!)
Someone who is born with positive DP isn’t guaranteed to have a better life with those who receive negative one, because if the one born with negative DP enrich his efforts in life, he/she might have a happier life in the future.
Image: MBC ‘Section TV Relay’
Back then it seems that every holiday had it's own theme song, one song that the kids and sometimes even the grownups went around humming or whistling, ya know?
In the book of The Dead, who ever imagined a chapter titled “After Jerry?”
First, notice that the variable we added is “dateCreated”. This is important, because that is a magic field name that tells grails that it should automatically populate it with the current date/time when the record is created. That way, we aren’t responsible for writing any code to populate this field, when the author clicks “Post” it will automatically happen.
Holy Mother-of-God, I must give off an aura of woundedness to the world…
The due diligence process is a comprehensive audit review that involves review of the real estate, financial, corporate, engineering, environmental and other documents related to the transaction to assist the buyer (or lender) to quickly identify potential issues of concern with a property. Due diligence is a paper intensive, time consuming and detail-oriented process which requires what paralegals can do best: thorough analysis of documents under rather pressing deadlines. The main function of due diligence is to verify, verify and verify one more time. Literally, EVERY document concerning the property MUST be examined. We are talking about the deed, title policy, survey, including legal description, engineering plans, zoning requirements, environmental reports, leases with any and all extensions and modifications, notes and mortgages, guarantees and warranties, certificates of occupancy, insurance policies, elevator maintenance contracts, licenses, parking lot contracts, laundry contracts, utility companies agreements, rent rolls and payment history, utility, tax and water bills, employees payrolls, physical inventory of furniture, fixtures, equipment and supplies, litigation history, including details of any past or pending litigations, corporate documents including organizational structure, formation documents, list of states where the company is authorized to do business…the list can go on and on. Usually, the due diligence process walks hand in hand with the negotiation, so, the purchase agreement will be your guideline of which documents will cross your desk at one point or another during the process and, based on the results of due diligence, the deal can be “killed,” re-negotiated, stalled or moved forward.
Chang may yet have his day in the sun, however, as the ongoing political crisis in China reveals the institutional weaknesses of one-party rule.
Enjoy the May Holiday Monday if it's within reach and have a great week too. Thanks so much for taking the time to call by!
I’ve been stuck here on the property all weekend, and my plans were thwarted when the driveway froze shut Saturday night. We needed a few groceries, but have been getting by just fine with what I have stored in the cupboards.
Once past Labor Day people get serious about doing business, hoping to gin up profits before the end of the year. There are, of course, always books ready to offer all manner of advice.
